Frampton’s final and most ambitious project was The Magellan Cycle, which he intended to encompass all of human experience in a projected thirty-six hour film cycle. He died before he could complete the project, but its unfinished nature is of a piece with an aesthetic that appreciates failure more than success. Frampton celebrated the failures not only of conventional narrative but of the cinematic medium itself, incorporating emulsion scratches, camera hiss and other flaws inherent to filmmaking. But this does not make his work seem like failed art. Rather, it inspires the viewer to work out their own solutions to the cinematic equations Frampton proposes.
Thank you, God, for the gift of…..
I'm bummed. My class for yesterday was canceled... no "students". That's both of my April classes down the tubes. Yet I still have to create classes for May and June for a meeting today. I put a lot of time and work into making cards I think people would like to make and when they don't go, I get really bummed. Well, back to working on classes.
For descendants of enslaved people from the Drayton network of plantations, Toni’s research has unearthed a goldmine of important historical information. Using Charles Drayton’s diaries, she has uncovered stories of sacrifice, struggles, and heroism. Because two-thirds of the slaves that were owned by Charles were sold, there are many families in the Lowcountry that had roots at Drayton Hall but were separated from them during the mid-1800s. Their ancestors were later freed from other plantations in the area but may have important Drayton Hall roots. For Toni, Charles’s diaries shed a human light on the Drayton family history that until now hasn’t been fully explored. “These diaries really “people,” the historic landscape, and bring the human experience back to a history that can be seen as simply facts, places, and lists.”
Familiar thoughts, feelings and behaviours have returned.
please pray for zaida, pray that she heals inside and out, pray that the problem with her dad is resolved and that oneday you will read an entry of zaidas positve testimony.
I was heading down Regent street with a blue ford windstar ahead of me. The lady driving the windstar was poking along at a breakneck speed of 25 km. per hr. When the street turned to 2 lanes, I pulled out and passed her.
American Idol Season 11 Top 7 Performance Rankings 4/18/12
You're thinking, as they were, that I was reacting to the words: "Lung Cancer".......
It felt like a good day to snap some blog pics so I wore a blue blouse. For the purpose of matching. We don't match at all though. We GO. There's a difference. Look it up.
The story switches between Peyton’s and Chris’ points of view to keep up the suspense, and I think this works well. Both characters are well-developed and you can really feel the raw pain they experience when they see each other again. Chris’ addiction to painkillers heightens the suspense even more and I love how he is ready to quit because of Peyton. The only thing that didn’t sit well with me was how long it took from exposure to death and re-animation in this book. In Tomorrow Land, it can take up to 2 weeks before you actually turn! Since most common viruses take 4-7 days to incubate, that seems a little ridiculous to me.
Do you see any particular challenges facing needleworkers today?
He is a prominent activist for Aids-related charities and has raised tens of Millions of dollars for Aids causes around the globe.
John 15:1-17 (Read from NIV) I am the true vine… Love each other.
try to crop out the wall its leaning against so all we see is you in the mirror.
Childcare was found to significantly improve development for disadvantaged children. But the ‘lion’s share of the population experienced significant declines in motor-social development and health measures as well as increased behavioural problems’, the study found.
Through tutoring and cooking I’ve gotten a glimpse into the diverse lifestyles of sevillanos. Tutoring Daniel exposed me to young life and the approach toward academics in private schools. Maria shared her life path with me which was very intriguing especially since I’m so interested in the culinary world. Living with Loli has been a great experience in general but I’ve loved hearing her talk about Spanish food and teach me about one of her passions.
Preheat oven to 375*F.
heart jumping, lungs aching
Anyway...it's one of those shows that make you think. Or, at least, it's one of those shows that made me think. About what was, about what is, about what could have been.
Quin opens with a front kick to the face which misses, then lands a leg kick. Cresswell goes for a single leg, and gets the take down. Quin is trying to use the fence to get back up.
Starting Weight: 19st 9lb - 275lbs
did I mention I fall asleep around 9:30?
If they gave some incentive, like 5% off if you 'shwop' something, fine. (Please, that word is awful!) But as it stands it neither makes good financial sense nor good recycling sense. One to avoid.
Well, some of that we did but most we didn’t
A new model-ID stainless steel plate in the center console
In 1866, a variation on the usual theatrical spectacle debuted at Niblo's that soon proved to be his most popular offering. Plays had featured popular songs in the past, and variants of operas (or rather, sung plays or 'ballad-operas') were popular. But in September, The Black Crook debuted, with odd traits at the time that have now come to typify the modern musical.
Substantive issues: The Board first looked at the "informational" refusal. The Examining Attorney contended that "ONE NATION UNDER GOD is such a common phrase universally signifying a sense of patriotism and displayed for the message it conveys that it is incapable of being perceived as a trademark in this case." He cited numerous websites demonstrating that ONE NATION UNDER GOD is a well-known phrase from the Pledge of Allegiance, frequently mentioned in articles and used by third parties in connection with the sale of their products.
Last weekend, when I looked back over my week, I realised it had not be particularly good as you can see in my previous blog (It never rains but it pours).
This sort of back-referencing, at least if Wikipedia articles are to be believed, continues today - hardly a departed character on the show doesn’t have some mention of an episode years after they left in which their final fate (usually death) is announced. And, of course, it’s implicit in doing something like bringing a character back over forty years after their last appearance.
God – forgive my heart’s pride…for thinking that I don’t need You, and/or that I deserve Your blessings, and/or earned them myself. Sometimes “we” (read, “I”) even think we’ve earned Your blessings by our pain and sufferings! Even that does not – CAN not earn His blessings. His blessings pour out of Who He is, and how He loves us. He is indeed, patient, gracious and compassionate. But, maybe our pain and sufferings CAN – if we let them and don’t cling to bitterness – humble us, “so that He might do us good in the end.” – Deuteronomy 8:16.
Firpo's Balloon Cocktail (as adapted, trial #2)
IDD-on-Nutrition, creating a nutrition conscious society.
And it is Biblical. Paul said: “My speech and my preaching was not with enticing words of man’s wisdom, but in demonstration of the Spirit and of power; that your faith should not stand in the wisdom of men, but in the power of God.” (I Corinthians 2:4-5)
Hope to see you tomorrow.
see your shadow
I absolutely love Carolina beach. It was exactly what I pictured in my head of a sleepy beach town.
The train station in Farmington, twenty miles from our door and my objective this trip. I chose to make the picture taking ride on Sunday when there is no train service because I wanted to make sure there were kids on the motocross course. With a pretty strong prevailing south wind all spring and most of the summer along the path I would have otherwise taken the train home. It is cheap and quick. But today, with no train service, Maun agreed to meet me for a coffee in the supermarket next to the Farmington train station and give me a ride home. As I was locking my bike inside the store entry I saw another cyclist simply walk his bike into the store. I didn’t really pay attention but Maun was already there and saw him as well. She asked him where he was going with his bike in the store and he explained that the store has a bike valet who will take your bike from you, give you a token, take your bike someplace and then in exchange for the token, retrieve the bike for you when you are through in the store. Simply unbelievable.
B. Troote
But the story and interest in this case was not about the money, but his alleged involvement in murder and other serious crime while in the pay of Special Branch.
When it was good taste to wear rouge, fashionable women used boxes with double compartments. One was destined to receive patches, the other, rouge. Patches were sometimes kept in jewellery-type boxes of green and gold leather.
Our goal is to have a fun evening where a paper lantern is lit out the front of every house and business on Wray Avenue. As Fremantle’s only avenue, I believe Wray could look beautiful with decorated paper lanterns lining the sides of the street.
1. Pretty Good Year (Demo)
Plain Ol' Cheesecake w/Triple Berry Topping
Imo state. The second leg of
A customer of mine had a unique purse. It was a cigar box with a handle. It was awesome. I asked her where she bought it, thinking my wife, a purse freak, would love one. She said she made it. I asked her if she sold them and she said, "thought never crossed my mind until now." Three days after our encounter, she walked in with 2 purses to show the wife. I bought them both.
IT Governance and Relationship Improvement
The thought of you disgusts me
And then things go a bit south:
Emaciated and spent she cradled her naked, famished infant to her dilapidated breasts. He tried to squeeze out a drop of milk into his mouth . He did not have the strength even to suck , nor did she have any milk to give. Two more little children huddled close to her.
DBKL has declared “ground zero” (Dataran Merdeka) off-limits for 48 hours starting 6am today. The court has also issued an order barring the public, including Bersih 3.0 leaders, from entering the vicinity of Dataran Merdeka tomorrow until May 1. The order includes sealing off the roads leading to the iconic landmark and its surrounding areas.
I recently got married and I love my new life with my husband. We didn’t move in until after we were married… Well, we didn’t do anything before we were man and wife. Now I find it impossible to sleep in the same bed with him! I’m used to having a bed by myself and he’s constantly rolling and hogging up the sheets. Is it ok if we sleep in separate beds or is that unhealthy for our marriage?
But I realise now, that even though I fear.. these barriers are my weakness..
What a sea so blue.
As I look back, these are the most memorable moments of the last year:
Unlike Facebook, where both parties have to agree to befriending each other, Twitter is more open. It’s perfectly possible to chat to people on a regular basis without mutual followage. Twitter offers the opportunity to directly contact people who may be Good To Know and who, shock horror, may become Proper Friends. The directness and ease of such contact is really not to be underestimated. As with all networking, though, it’s worth
Ragheb: (He reads the message that is written on the wall.) “Long have women been oppressed by the Public Court. Open your eyes and put an end to this injustice.” What is this rubbish?
most material is transformed into buildings
Diving was not the only wonderful part of Mexico. Afternoons and evenings were spent drinking various concoctions featuring either rum or tequila while soaking in the bar side jacuzzi, eating amazing food in town or staying in and making seriously delicious meals of our own, swimming about the shallow reef outside the hotel with flashlights in search of octopi (yes, we did find one!) and in general enjoying the good company.
Some of the greatest information I have come across has been from others, who share their lives via social media. People that I follow and read regularly.
"'But that's Sarah Jane,' he said, confused 'In old Doctor Who. From years ago. How come she always look exactly the same?' It's not a comfort today, of course, but children will still be saying that fifty years from now."
Fourth, make sure you understand the teaching of the resurrection that the Church has always proclaimed. For, while this was a real, historical, physical event, it was not merely a resuscitation to the same earthly life. Rather, it was a transformation; and Christ’s risen, glorified body had new characteristics and abilities, as the Gospel accounts show. For his resurrection was the firstfruits of the New Creation, when all will be made new.
To complete this meal I made bean tacos to accompany the rice. The refried beans came from an order I made online via nicemarket.net. I haven't found refried beans at my local Homeplus or Lotte Mart, but have seen other canned beans, such as black beans and cannelli. I think a black bean taco could also work. Tortillas are something you could easily make yourself here, but if your like me you can just buy them locally.
Just keeping it real. :)
How did you come up with the characters in Those in Peril?
I was inspired by the Jar-o-Lanterns from Martha Stewart I saw at Halloween. Just add some diluted paint to a mason jar, move it around, pour out excess and let dry. Easy peasy.
The study, carried out by Nielsen Global Consumer Confidence Index, gauged how people were feeling during the last quarter of 2011.
Everything is inspirational. Writer's have the ability to pull the inspiration out of anything. To writers, everything is inspiring, and quite frankly I like that. Who else is cool enough to do that? (I never said I was humble.)
I've seen the geezer, we'll call him Monsieur Propre, in his impeccable blue uniform, not a white hair on his head out of place, vacuuming the same 3 square feet, over and over and OVER (poor little chap, never seems to get clean enough.). If there were a crumb left in that carpet from my colleagues' incessant need to cram sweets down my throat, I assure you, it has been sucked into oblivion, never again to see the light of day.
Kult – Heretic Kingdoms (PC)
"I've let you down, I've let you down"
Trapped
Another good attack led to a free kick on the edge of Everton’s area. Up stepped rVp to take the free kick. rVp’s last goal from a free kick came on the 7th of October, 2007. That was in the 3-2 win over Sunderland.
The company was founded in 2005 by Graham Miller, formerly a director at Random House, and he set about presenting a model of publishing to prospective authors that combined elements of mainstream publishing, partnership and self-publishing. Importantly, Discovered Authors is also a part of parent company, BookForce UK, a small POD print service and distributor.
I sent out my mail already so you should be getting it in the next day or two, but I didnt get much mail so I didnt really know what to write about.
- We are not the same persons this year as last; nor are those we love. It is a happy chance if we, changing, continue to love a changed person. ~W. Somerset Maugham
Grayson bless him has his ‘art’. He hopes the show will inspire people to take their inner lives more seriously. Seeing world culture through his obsessions and perversities might help people to start out on their own personal pilgrimages and find relics of their own selves laid out before them just as he is coming to realise that the Tomb of the Unknown Craftsman may be a very elaborate inner self portrait.
The altar is the secret place we run to. Whether it is in the time of affliction or bliss, it is a place we must constantly visitor perhaps build a home there. It is a place we have a better perspective of things. Maybe a place where we see things the way God does? I have found that taking whatever it is to that altar is the first step to enlightenment.
What was the course of your treatment plan?
“Who cares whether prosecutors can rely on crime lab reports unless they make analysts who prepared the reports available to testify?” Stern asked, referring to this term’s “hottest” case, Briscoe v. Virginia. “I’d like to hear what Chief Justice (John) Roberts has to say about how that drinking contest between Cooter and Junior ended up in a fistfight. Clarence Thomas would definitely have thoughts regarding why Elwood got home so late and forgot Lydia’s birthday (again!) that are worth sharing.”
When Bersih 3.0 first began, it attracted the base that voted for the opposition, those that have already made up their minds.
Me So Horny
But yeah—150 miles long, roughly corresponding to the northern extent of the big Beaumont Blackout, and the point where the whole thing started was within 30 miles of the Ghost Road, where you have these periodic, and essentially magnetic, anomalies associated with these ghost lights that have gone on for as long as anybody knows.
Check out this article on Planned Parenthood from my good friend and fellow blogger Subvet over at his blog Clik here.
25.) Tommy Davis, Infielder (1967)
This colleague gave me this analogy:
A pretty red outfit just aches to be paired with gold jewelry/accessories. I use a lot of gold when on Polyvore but in real life I wear more silver. Once I get a nice gold watch then I think that will change, since I only have a silver one right now.
culinary perfection and even the rendering of heaven itself.
Congratulations to the winner of Dorothy Love's Beauty for Ashes Libbi H! Please e-mail your address to Christen (ckrumm@litfusegroup.com)!
Imagine the success this could add to your next direct mail campaign! Heck, when your prospective customers know some one, intimately or casually, who’s on your customer list it adds credibility to your claims. They can simply step next door to find out more about you. You supply a link that connects them to you, and increases the odds enticing them to give your product or service a try.
I noticed today that the potatoes (Maris Piper) that I chitted late March, and planted just before Easter have started growing. I will keep an eye on this and earth them up when needed.
Maybe there's more to it, but I'm no detective.
First of all, maybe I should explain my post title today - I dropped my camera down the toilet wilst we were out on Friday afternoon (please don't ask if I had flushed the chain before the little mishap, because I really don't want to answer that question ha ha ha!!!). So I wanted to test that it was still working properly - all the photos in this post have been taken since the camera's little swim, so yes it's working - yayyy!!!
It hangs on my wall and I treasure it; but I’ll take it down and bring it to Connolly’s on May 4th just as so many others will bring theirs when we commemorate a towering man and a great Irish-American during his month’s mind.
1) As several posters have mentioned--see comments under "(Part 1 of) Its Kind of Odd How Technology Both Enslaves..."--we seem to be wedded to some of our gadgets. How many times have our friends, family, co-workers, or even ourselves said that we can't live without our television, smartphone, computer, tablet, etc. Heck, even if we haven't said, it is still probably true for many of us. However, just because we can't "live without" a piece of technology does not necessarily imply that our autonomy has been limited. A company may "not be able to function" without a certain employee, but we don't necessarily think that the company is a slave to the worker.
1. Gretel. I'm hoping to have this one made with plaits too, just to see if they're interchangeable. It should be possible to get a side parting as well. Not sure if I should ask for a thinner hair bunch?
Tunisia’s secularist will look with anxiety to an Egypt which has turned further to the right. Coupled with Ennahdha’s moderate rhetoric, secularist alarmism has mostly fallen on deaf ears in Tunisia. Most Tunisians simply do not see their country following the path of Iran or Saudi Arabia, and the Algerian civil war – with its complex moral narrative – is already a decade in the past. An Egypt which has turned toward the extreme would provide secularists with a narrative that could be a call to action among secular sympathizers in the country.
1 tsp red chilli powder
MG and I are living it up in NYC right now and we made our requisite stop at the Converse store yesterday. Located in the heart of SoHo on Broadway, the shop opened up 18 months ago and as is the case with most shops on Broadway, it’s a tourist magnet. The floor-to-ceiling Converse wall in the colours of the American flag (see above) is worth the trip to Manhattan alone.
She fucked me there on the carpet, and I freed my hands to grasp her hips so I could pull them to me each time I pushed my hips up to meet her. We fucked and came, and then when she collapsed against me she was panting and laughing and kissing me.
5.) “Happy Days” f/Mac Miller, Bun B & Shawn Stockman
Roxanne and I started blogging within a few months of each other and I came across her blog when we were both newbies. As soon as I found her, I knew I had found something special. From that first visit to my most recent, I find that visiting River Garden Studio is more like visiting a magical place rather than a computer site. Roxanne fills each and every post with creativity, beauty, grace, and love. Roxanne and I have worked on a number of projects together and she is every bit as wonderful as her blog would suggest.
“The day before the concert it suddenly struck me that, instead of singing the beautiful song Don’t Cry Alone that evening, Robin was in a coma and might die.
From the director of "Angels In the Outfield" comes an inspiring story about a special boy with an amazing gift, and the coach who believed. Dean Cain and Luke Schroder star in the gmc World Premiere Movie: "A Mile In His Shoes,"
It is a perennial plant in zones 2 – 9, and can be grown outside of these areas as an annual. It is the main root that is harvested in the fall and the secondary roots, also removed from the ground, can then be replanted, and will remain in a dormant state until the following spring. It can also be an invasive plant by sending the offshoots of the root to the area surrounding it.
But, farewell magnolia blossoms. Better luck next year.
I'm serious about this stuff folks. I'm gonna make it to the Tough Mudder come October! I made it through the first week alive. If the increased exercise didn't kill me, I was sure work from school was sure to finish the job. I ran 5 days, for a total of 17 miles! It was an average of close to 3.33 miles a run. I was pretty sore the first few days, but got my appetite back and some long-lost energy. Office work drains everything out of me, so this increased exercise will help.
I’m not qualified to say if this will help him politically, but it would be consistent with his political philosophy. He’d remain the underdog, fighting against the system and big business, and penalised, he might claim, for doing so.
One of my all-time favorite movies, the trilogy by the Wachowskis not only has captivated me but has also helped in explaining some of the most complex concepts and has further given life to my thoughts.
Let's take this pretty lame photo of the pont Alexandre III:
Best as always
Now what he did was evil in the eyes of the Lord, and He put him to death also.
If curiosity gets the better of you and you want to find out what a term really means then check out the urban dictionary.
I hope that makes sense. And right now, I will say a prayer for the children of Haiti who are lost, and without parents, and hurting. It is too much pain to bear, I believe. I'm glad we have a God who does not turn His face, and who does not treat us as our sins--or our nation's sins--deserve. We have a God who loves and cares, and may He always be our model.
What a fun-filled month!!
When there's conflict in my marriage, when my kids disappoint me or I blow it as a mom, I have friends I can turn to. I know that they'll listen, I know they'll understand, and they'll support me -- or if necessary, tell me that I need to modify my thinking.
I caution the girls to never think that they're better than anyone else because if they do, nobody will want to be their friend. But do you know what? I am better than him.
In 2009-10, Morehead State again improved its win total, going 24-11 and making it to the second round of the College Basketball Invitational. That year, Athlon’s Sports Magazine deemed him one of the Top 10 Under the Radar Coaches.
And our Top 3 for this month are....................
Addy never wanted the spotlight. When her principal told her she'd be representing their small, Christian school on "The Book of Love" (the reality show's name), she developed an instant bad attitude. A 'tude that continued through her first weeks on the show - winning her surprising publicity and support, but also earning a few enemies. As the days and weeks pass, Addy continues to "win" - she stays on the show, despite all attempts to make her look foolish, bratty, unpolished, and just plain unworthy. Her attitude also begins to change, as God works on her heart and shows her that she is there for a reason. Beginning to relax and make a few friends, including one of the assistant producers-slash-undercover Secret Service Agents, Addy finds herself drawn more and more to Jonathon - the President's son, and object of all the girls' desire. But is it real, or just another trick of so-called reality tv?
17-Who would you invite to your dream dinner party?
Me-ow!
Slow motion is better than no motion.
While I'm wearing my more dressy outfit, I would like to see Derek in
I do not have any photos to show you in this post. I just wanted to reintroduce myself and let everyone know what has been going on with me over the past year.
A letter dated May 12th and signed by the chairs of both the House and Senate Finance Committees says school officials should hold off on all projects still awaiting their approval.
The hikers on the trail give a good perspective of how big this falls is. If memory serves, it is 198 feet.
“Far, far north of here, in the place above where Earth meets the sky, there lives Snow Woman. She is very very old, and very very round and very very wrinkled, and her long, long, heavy hair is whiter than swansdown, and softer than velvet. Her little house is made of a million huge icicles all stuck together by her friend, Jack Frost, and the tiny square windows are covered in lacy ice paintings of all the flowers that ever were in the world. She has few visitors—only Jack Frost and the North Wind can bear the cold of her house—and she lives all alone except for a flock of white snow geese, which lay eggs for her, a winged white reindeer, which gives her milk, and a herd of white polar bears, which bring her white fish to eat, and white sealskins to wear.
Tuesday I posted:
Answer: The first country to formally recognize the United States of America was Morocco in 1777.
“The Babylon project is Iraq’s biggest and most ambitious by far, a reflection of the ancient city’s fame and its resonance in Iraq’s modern political and cultural heritage,” the Times reported, noting that “in November, the State Department announced a new $2 million grant to begin work to preserve the site’s most impressive surviving ruins. They include the foundation of the Ishtar Gate, built in the sixth century B.C. by Nebuchadnezzar’s father, Nabopolassar, and adorned with brick reliefs of the Babylonian gods Marduk and Adad.”
While adding salt, go according to your instinct because you obviously cant taste raw meat. The next time i am definitely going to jot down the measurement.
Maureen Kao a.k.a. Lil' Mint Mocha
Don't laugh. I am lazy and have zero desire to use fresh garlic and mince it all up. This isn't as good as the 'real' thing, but it is way convenient and fast! Try it out.
And now we are jamming to The Preacher’s Wife soundtrack. I love my life.
Are passive sign-ups a good idea? It seems so easy and convenient to bring people into the fold in this way. You’ve got something they want – a free download, a product trial, etc – and they opt into your newsletter as a way to get a great deal. Most people don’t think too much about giving out their email address, even knowing they are signing up for promotional offers. The trick here is not to collect email addresses but rather to attract the type of person who would appreciate your newsletter. Passive sign-ups are usually only a good idea if what you have to offer via your newsletter is similar to what motivated the sign-up in the first place.
The story of this expedition also records the discovery of the Mississippi and the first voyage of Europeans upon it. While history gives credit for the discovery of the Mississippi River to Hernando de Soto, it must be noted that Alonso de Pineda discovered the mouth of the Mississippi in 1519, and that Cabeza de Vaca ( right) crossed it near its mouth in 1528.
Joyce: No, I think I'll post it on Twitter. ... Darn, now it gave me a blank screen that says it can't connect to the server.
I wore this outfit the other day out to my dad's birthday dinner. So I'm a little more dressed up in this photo then usual.
When I say BLACK put your hands on your back.
I found this blogging idea here and thought I had to give it a try too. I guess we all have those things we are afraid to tell one another. This is a bit scary and I don’t know if I’ll reveal some secrets, but hang on and we’ll see..
One question that’s on many SCSU and other college student’s minds is: “How has the state been spending on SCSU and other colleges?” The answer is that the state has been constantly decreasing spending since the 90s.
Puerto Jimenez is the gateway to Corcovado National Park. You can book a number of tours here and they have all the amenities required for a short stay. You can even go on a caiman feeding tour to get a look. Not a place you want to go for a swim….
Or even something ridiculous as “My big toe hurts” and it will convince you that you have arthritis or erythromelalgia
So, the scattering of wildlife refuges and national parks that I visited along the way were especially treasured and will be the focus of my blogs to follow. I'm grateful that they have been set aside, free of development, for wildlife to thrive and for the public to enjoy.
Located on Bali’s southernmost peninsula, high on the cliffs above the surging waters of the Indian Ocean … midway between the sea and the sky.
The land is privately owned and the owners are planning yet another multi-story building to replace this icon of Subiaco.
As a matter of fact, on Friday as part of my fast and prayer I said to the Blessed Mother "Mary thank you for all the gifts you have given me during my two weeks here. Thank you even for the fact that this time I will not be celebrating mass for the Cenacolo community. Also thank you for allowing us, the priests, to be present at an apparition. (We, the priests, on retreat had been told that the visionaries would be present that evening and we were invited to attend the apparition.)" Little did I know that even though I thought I was being generous in my prayer Our Blessed Mother had other plans. Within moments of my prayer, my friend and my gracious host, Mate, received a call from the Cenacolo community. He said, “Father, the women's community of the Cenacolo needs a priest to celebrate mass tonight at six, can you do it?” They have no one else? I asked myself can I celebrate mass for the community. Now my prayer was finally answered, but not the way I expected. What was I supposed to do? If I celebrated mass I would miss the apparition. At that moment, I had a great sense of peace. I felt as if Mary said to me, “be at peace I will honor whatever decision you make”. After a few moments, I said to Mate, “yes, I will do it”. Without hesitation I will celebrate mass. I realized that the invitation Mary had given me to open my heart meant just that - open your heart to my Son in every way possible. It is only when you open your heart and even more so when it breaks that you begin to understand the love that Jesus has for you. I had a wonderful and blessed experience celebrating mass for the women of the Cenacolo community. I felt again as if I was in heaven. Their singing and their prayers (in Italian) filled me with joy! I felt as if I was on holy ground. I told the women a story about when I returned from my first trip to Medjugorje. My first trip was in 1985, and on the plane ride home I fell sound asleep. When I was asleep, I saw in my mind's eye Mary and she was holding the baby Jesus. I heard Mary say to me, “Peter, my son, take my Son back with you to the United States”. In the background, I heard singing, it sounded like angels to me. I had never heard these voices again - until I celebrated mass for the women of the Cenacolo community. I told them that their voices reminded me of angels. So now, I am back in New York City. I am preparing to begin my new assignment as a teacher of theology at one of our Jesuit high schools in Manhattan. Each day, I face the challenge of living from the graces I experienced in Medjugorje, but more importantly, living from the grace of the sacraments. So you see, next time you receive a sign from God - open your hearts - for He wants to use you as an instrument of His love and care for all whom you meet.
She was stared at. The kids asked questions about her and then moved on to playing with the other kids. The adults stared some more. She wasn't having fun. I wasn't having fun. And our incredible, awesome, loving nurse, would never have said she wasn't having fun. But I'm sure she wasn't.
Given this context, the Commission considers that Google's incentives to use the threat of injunctions to forcibly extract cross-licences from good faith licensees are most likely be constrained by the prospect of an investigation based on Article 102 TFEU.
Simplify 101 is offering the readers of IHeart Organizing 15% off enrollment of any of their current workshops - Organizing 101, Simplify Your Life with Habits + Routines and Get Organized for the Holidays. Simplify Your Life with Habits + Routines will take the mystery out of creating new habits and routines, so you can lead the life you want to live. When you have good habits and simple routines in place, your day flows smoothly, because you don't have to constantly remind yourself to get things done. Get Organized for the Holidays is the ultimate holiday planning workshop. Get simple tips and ideas so that you stay energized and joyful all season long! To take advantage of this offer, enter IHEARTSAVING15 during checkout. This offer is good from 9/20/11 through 9/27/11 and can't be combined with any other offer. {Get Organized for the Holidays is on early bird discount - 20% off through 9/22}
One by one they would answer, “I'm a Billy Goat Gruff!”
and, yes, you'll have to find your own bowls and thoughtful friend with fine taste 'cuz i'm keeping mine close for now. mind you, the friend part is no easy task i'd advise you to rest up and be nice to everyone in your path tomorrow 'cuz you never know who your next bestie's gonna be.
- side metal corners with engraved “gucci” personalization
Instead I pulled my laptop out from the desk and sat in bed doing some research on lost dogs. It didn’t take me long to find and article from a local newspaper with the dramatic headline: ‘Pampered Pooch Presumed Dead’. It was from the village to the East, about two miles away, and it detailed the loss of a West Highland Terrier bought by two wealthy parents for their spoilt teenage daughter; at least, that is how I read it. Apparently the dog had gone missing almost a month ago and there was a large reward for any information on his whereabouts.
The game Angry Birds, which I’m sure most of you have played or at least heard of, is now expanding to a new location; space. Along with the other locations including “rio” and “seasons” of angry birds, this new location will add to the popularity of this game. Amazingly, Angry Birds has been downloaded by over 500 million people! The game has been able to adapt to several different mediums such as the computer and even apparel. As the article explains, this is usually really risky to try and switch mediums because you aren’t guaranteed the same success as you had on your original medium, but Angry Birds has not only survived starting on new mediums, but also thrived. With an income of $42 million from the game, those are hard results to argue with.
It was another long day yesterday :) Got the kids off to school (no headache, thank goodness!), spent the morning designing my 3 new WordArt packs, lunch with my mom and her friend, Luell, at Taco Bell, playing with Jimmy, kids off the bus at 3:45 pm, homework, football practice, Boy Scouts, more homework, bedtime, and meltdowns. Meltdowns, you ask? My poor big boys had rough days.
‘Well, I know you’re the doctor, but I honestly don’t believe this is depression.’ Nope, that didn’t quite answer the question, but my brain had kind of reverted to Planned Speech mode.
If your book were to be selected by our editorial review board, we would make it a “Feature Title” which includes media coverage and an invitation to be a featured author signing books at our booth during next year's International Christian Retail Show where over 10,000 people, including many bookstore owners/buyers attend. It would also be a featured title at the Deep River Books website.
1/2 cup dried shitake mushrooms
Evie Evie
I recently read a recently published opinion piece in the New York Times entitled “In the Philippines, Haunted by History”. The author, Gina Apostol, details her opinion in regards to why the Philippines remain an extremely divided country, both in its history and its politics. The article details the Philippine continued reliance to American aid. It is not exactly a new story. It has been told in countless number of ways by countless number people. Ever since the archipelago became an independent nation, it has been administered by elites whose vested interest is to enrich themselves and their cronies. In consequence, the country remains bankrupt[1] and ill managed. Filipinos, therefore, find little solace in the country of their birth. What little there is in employment has been ravaged by over-competition that which made daily wages for a typical Filipino household insufficient to attain a decent standard of living.
Slinking, up Valencia Street- the coffee shops talking,
"Well, at the rate you're going, mukhang wala ng matitira sa akin!"
Many have remarked upon Chabrol's blistering critique of middle-class repression, and there's certainly something to that, most notably in films like La femme infidèle (1969; later remade by Adrian Lyne in 2002 as Unfaithful) and Le boucher (1970), where his technical precision and ironic detachment suggest twisted desires lurking underneath innocent-looking exteriors. And yet there was always a deeper empathy lurking underneath Chabrol's chilly façade. Like Alfred Hitchcock, Chabrol understood that, whether we'd like to admit it or not, such dark emotions are a part of what makes us all human.
The CIA article for the beginning of Sukarno’s ties with communist China:
"Drive You Stupid Cow!" the girl screamed in her mother's face.
In the interest of full disclosure we shall now note that Southern Tier is something of a "hometown" beer for us. It's located just outside of Jamestown, New York (home of Lucille Ball, NFL commish Roger Goodell, and the 10,000 Maniacs!), about 30 minutes from where we grew up. Sure, we'd been gone for five years by the time the brewery opened, but it still tastes like home. Or at least like damned fine beer.
This beautiful and elegant design, called Celtic Yellow Rose Border on Ivory Wedding, has a beautiful ivory background with a gorgeous celtic knot border with yellow roses. This would be perfect for your Celtic or Irish wedding or event!
I guess I'm just ahead of the curve, as I began urban backyard chicken keeping 6 years ago. I began with 4 ameracauna hens, 2 of which I still have and still give me an egg each almost every day. They used to lay through the winter, but the past 2 years they stop in November and resume in late February (and really, who can blame them?). At one point I had 6 hens, having added 2 babies three years ago. Now I am down to 2 of the six year olds, and one of the youngers -- so only 3. However, from these three I am currently getting more than a dozen eggs a week. I would like to get two or three new chicks or pullets this summer, but we go to the beach in May, which makes timing difficult. Often when we get back the stores have sold out all of their chicks and don't get any more. But we'll see.
In the words of Yoda “Do or Do not. There is no try”
and use my dreams as inspiration for every day life.
withstands accidental force to
Opera and musicals are contrived forms of music. There's no doubt that there is little less musically organic than an opera or musical about a time period, mainly because (a) the music is almost always written after the time period of the play is over, and thus is constructed retrospection with a good deal of tacky retrojection, and (b) because it is very hard to organically write music when you are trying to follow a story line. The story line is like form in poetry. It can help with delivery and meaning, but there are very few people who naturally write in iambic tetrameter. It is even harder to adapt rock music, which thrives on organic expression, to the opera format, which depends on hyperbole and constant story telling.
Check out this crazy pattern that I made yesterday! It took all of my brain power to get this pattern to make sense, and to cut this stencil. I made an actual stencil this time, though, out of plastic, and rolled it on like a real stencil (often, my stencils are not stencils but templates, then I hand paint the pattern). Anyway, I was proud of how the pattern interlocks, and I like the black and gold!
To dreams beached on the sand like thoughts of whale.
Adine Sagalyn
* Yellow Ink: Michaels $1.50 bin (to colour the shape of the outside sentiment)
Women’s birthing rights advocates stage protest in response to arrest of Indiana midwife
--José Ferrer Sala
Lambir assemblyman Ripin Lamat has called on the Malaysian Communications and Multimedia Commission (MCMC) to restrict the frequency of RFS.
We hope you enjoyed all the fabulous creations made using our NEW CHA stamps! Our Team went above and beyond to showcase these beauties, and we hope you visit their blogs to leave them some love.
blue blanket over
Allen Wentz moved to NYC after leaving the band, and became a session synthesist playing on many records and jingles. He has produced a number of indie projects over the years, scored a few indie films, and has had some song placements. He still composes and records under different aliases, as well as under his own name. Over the years he has worked with artists ranging from Luther Vandross and Roberta Flack, to Cyndi Lauper.
About those things that surpass your ability
Feet sweat. You can cut down on odors by keeping your feet clean and dry at all times.
I walked into the toy room to find every surface crawling with bizarre looking bugs. Apparently, GrunpyDaddy had collected them from the tomato plants and wanted to take them to work for analysis….he’s humanely left the lid off so they could breathe/escape and run rampant around the house (I have now moved them outside!).
Well at least I have learned my lesson, never to go and click on random websites when looking for pictures.
Nice that Bickerdyke confirms the difference between Burton Ale and Pale Ale. The former was thick and syrupy. A Strong Ale, not a Pale Ale. Those bashes of Peter the Great sound, well, great. Just my cup of tea. Though I guess that was probably one liquid that didn't get served.
Michelle Williams embodied femininity in her coral colored Louis Vuitton gown that featured a ruffled peplum. Williams amped up the femininity by adding a bow brooch to the top of the peplum. Watch this video for more on Williams’ red carpet look, http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dbs8PfAf9tE
This isn’t really water, but I thought it was pretty cool. This is CO2 inside of a soap bubble taken at the U.S. Science and Engineering Festival.
So what do you do to while away fourteen hours ….. you take plenty of snaps …… of the same things, over and over….
It was sort of by accident we truly discovered the value of water conservation and recycling. When we put a plastic barrel under a downspout to collect the rainwater for watering the plants in the yard, it was such a help we soon added a second large covered container in the back. This collected water was used to wash clothes, flush the toilets and do general house cleaning. At first I was absolutely stunned at the quantity of water used to wash, then rinse (twice) a load of clothes. We started collecting the last rinse water from the washing machine to use for cleaning, flushing toilets and mopping. As a matter of fact, the rinse water even already had a little soap still in it contributing even more to our savings. Two more large rain water collection containers were added beneath downspouts in the back of the house, mostly used as “utility” water. Our water and sewer bill plummeted by nearly 70%. Now who in the world is going to complain about that?
Currently the project is being fought most intensely by local residents including a group who would be forced out if the project is allowed to be completed as proposed.
Anyway, I am looking forward to a bunch of enterprising church employees using the language of this decision to avoid paying taxes, and we'll be interested in seeing how that goes. Class action suit, anyone?
She read my texts and when she got home today she made me very sorry that I had sent them. Very sorry! She then stated that she was going to start giving me maintenance spankings twice a week from now on, on top of any discipline spankings that I may earn. I will keep you informed.
Wild, adverse animals could calmly (and legally) be captured, domesticated, and accomplished to action forth ancillary you, or in your place.
If you’re tempted to drop pounds fast with the latest fad diet, it could leave you with less-than-healthy hair — along with a growling stomach. Low-calorie diets are often low in some of the most important nutrients for healthy hair, including omega-3 fatty acids, zinc, and vitamin A. In addition to stunting hair growth and leading to dullness, super-low calorie plans may even cause hair loss.
because shit seeps in quick.
Our Aim: the conference was originally conceived in 1996 as a meeting of the “Companions of the Book” and it has developed into a world forum for the presentation and discussion of recent writings, themes and music associated with the Work.
(ii) Face-to-face confrontation – Disclosure of identity is once again required, since this requirement embraces the notion that the accused be permitted to visually identify the witness. Save in cases where the accused is expressly prohibited from personally cross-examining the witness, cross- examination is also required in recognition of the accused’s right to appear unrepresented.
I just finished off my mammoth post for last week. I dare say it will take most of you a few days to read it but as I am now only posting once a week, I have to cram it all into a single post. We seem to be very busy here at the moment. Partly of our own choice and partly because that is what life is throwing at us at the moment. I would LOVE to be a totally proactive person. Wouldn’t it be nice to be able to instantly come up with solutions for everything that life hurls at you on the run while you are formulating a plan to get the best possible outcome from said situation? I tend to be the quivering wreck in the corner not coping very well at all thanks to my tendency towards reactivity rather than proactivity. I didn’t think you had a choice…I thought people were born proactive, or reactive but I am starting to see that it’s all choice. I am choosing to expose myself to all sorts of interesting premises at the moment. I am checking out world issues that are pertinent to who we are and how we choose to live. It’s very interesting to realise that the world doesn’t revolve around you and that you are only one tiny ant in the massive great nest we call Earth. It’s not only humbling but somewhat terrifying as well when you realise what a very small voice each individual has. That’s where we need community and like-minded groups of people. One person has a small voice that can usually be ignored. An entire community all chanting the same chant are quite a lot harder to ignore and social media allow us to be more aware of events and situations as they occur and allow us to lend our personal voice to our chosen causes. It’s no longer that easy to pull the wool over people’s eyes. If anything, it certainly allows you to open your eyes to all sorts of situations that you may never have been aware of. As a quintessential magpie I like to learn things and social causes are something that appeal to me.
Can I use your fabric, made by Moda, in a quilt pattern I design without your approval? Can I show an image of this quilt on the cover of the quilt pattern that I will sell?
That was the first snaffou. Mapquest got us
We're home now and hope you enjoyed our London blog. It's been a trip we won't forget. Thanks for coming along!
04 Lister - The Bugaloo
Bank-Anthony said that as a
Solid state radio -45
to Chekhov, Steinbeck, Truman Capote (especially his short stories), Saki, O. Henry, Kurt Vonnegut, Rick Bass, and some Irish authors, such as William Trevor. I love excellent poetry and am a fan of scores of poets, including Joyce William Stafford, Dorianne Laux, Jane Kenyon, Paul Verlaine, Marge Piercy, Joe and Nancy Paddock. I love great lyrics, too, such as Johnny Mercer’s line from “This Time the Dream’s on Me,” “…to see you through, till you’re everything you
But He also asks that I seek the peace and welfare of Wilmore. The peace and prosperity of Lexington. And with the gifts and talents that I have humbly been given, that will partly be played out in this great new opportunity I have to serve as the Director of Young Adult Ministries at Trinity Hill. I am so excited about Emerge. And there are so many ways in which I will be able to seek the peace and prosperity of this city by seeing these men and women walking in the truth of our Lord Jesus Christ.
I guess that I'll never win a big one because a black cat crossed my path ten years ago and I walked under a ladder last week---at least I have never run over a China man.
Book Synopsis: Four women–four friends–share a determination to stop a killer who has been stalking newlyweds in San Francisco. Each one holds a piece of the puzzle: Lindsay Boxer is a homicide inspector in the San Francisco Police Department, Claire Washburn is a medical examiner, Jill Bernhardt is an assistant D.A., and Cindy Thomas just started working the crime desk of the San Francisco Chronicle. But the usual procedures aren’t bringing them any closer to stopping the killings. So these women form a Women’s Murder Club to collaborate outside the box and pursue the case by sidestepping their bosses and giving each other a hand. The four women develop intense bonds as they pursue a killer whose crimes have stunned an entire city. Working together, they track down the most terrifying and unexpected killer they have ever encountered–before a shocking conclusion in which everything they knew turns out to be devastatingly wrong. Full of the breathtaking drama and unforgettable emotions for which James Patterson is famous, 1st to Die is the start of a blazingly fast-paced and sensationally entertaining series of crime thrillers.(Courtesy of GoodReads.com)
What’s the problem, Gib? Are you afraid of worms?
The mirror is from Ballard, and was a wedding gift to Mr. Sugarplum and me (from my aunts, coincidentally enough!). It's lived in the Den for years, but I think it's made for this room...and a definite improvement over the previous builder-grade mirror.
After a grueling day that started at 4 a.m. on Wednesday, I volunteered at Dress for Success in the evening. My 10-year-old daughter asked if she could volunteer with me. Carli has not accompanied me during my volunteer duties since she was a baby. I would spread out a blanket in the corner and she would sleep or play–but that was MANY years ago. Carli has always asked a lot of questions about what I do with the women while I volunteer. I believe it is good to instill a volunteering mindset while she is young. So, actually, I was thrilled that she wanted to join me!
I am so thrilled to be invited to this party and can’t wait to see her gorgeous home finished!
In the harrowing penultimate episode of the season, Reza travels to Great Neck, Long Island, for a reunion Shabbat with his extended Persian Jewish family. As the family gathers, Reza’s Jewish grandmother gives Reza what can only be described as the evil eye. When Reza confronts his father, the father admits that Reza’s grandmother considers Reza a “goyim” (non-Jew), and that she has been pressuring her son to ignore Reza.
How then did he happen to be running down a street naked with the woman's stolen purse in his hands?
Using a fetal stethoscope (or even a toilet paper roll), have your partner listen for your baby’s heartbeat. Then:
Were there places of rest in your week? Where were the green meadows…the peaceful streams?
I find reason to believe,
It seems odd to not let people know about it at all but then it feels like you're asking people to vote and that feels even odder. It's here if you're interested.
Phreak: Tons of damage?
Get it out, end it with a sigh.
BUTTONS AND BOWS (Lyrics)
Don't bother sending me another email unless its one that states ... I've posted your hard copy of DD. I'm tired of communicating with you and your padded ego!
a storyteller who lost his pen.
Charles, you know, husband of all husbands was amazing ... and blunt. As we spent the afternoon looking at the ocean and seeing how big and amazing God was and spending time alone from "life" together he said "You know what Kim, today was rough, but atleast we had a great weekend and NC State beat Carolina! (I immediately started to laugh) I had no idea this would happen to us. I am upset, but at the same time, we're fine. We're going to make it through this and have many many healthy babies in the future. I know you're strong and I think it's best for us to let you pass this miscarriage naturally and rely on the Lord for what's to come next." In fewer words he said "snap out of it Kim! Stop feeling pity for yourself or that you're less than a woman, you're my wife, the love of my life that God created perfectly and we're going to get through this!"
When you are through trying to improve, you are through. - Vince Lombardi
A Few other resources to help with your Menu Planning. I try
“Des Deux Villes” is at the same square but closer towards the MacDonald’s opposite the Houses of Parliament. Service is okay, prices are higher.
And it was finally okay for me to buy and wear the awesome "guy" tees that I secretly coveted as a little girl. (I cannot tell you how desperately unfair it was that only boys got to have superhero Underoos when I was a kid. I am still traumatized by the injustice of it all.)
What kind of music did you listen too? Do you have a song that just sends you straight back?
“Life is either a daring adventure or nothing at all” –Helen Keller
They’re giving us a brush hog and disc and bucket with it. We get to accessorize.
We meant to just show her that he could do it, but then he headed for the door, and then down the hall, and then down another hall. We took a small break at the water fountain and Roman made it to his destination-THE PLAYGROUND!
So to anyone who says “but I have to vote for what I believe in” – well, my question is, what do you believe in more? Do you believe everyone should be forced by law to always do what you think they should do, or do you think that people should be allowed to make their own choices in life, even when they disagree with yours?
I have good and bad things to say about the shipping. First of all, it was amazingly fast considering it was coming from Saudi Arabia. It was faster than most orders I place within the US, even with accelerated shipping! I placed my order on a Thursday night (at almost midnight), and it was delivered the following Wednesday. Less than a week. That is… it was supposed to be delivered. Wahat Aljalabiya shipped within 2 days and sent me a tracking number with DHL. At this point I signed up through the DHL website for delivery and exception notifications. Unfortunately, DHL attempted to deliver while I was not at home (at the office) and did not leave my package!
Classic old school reggae from much missed Dennis Brown.
So what do you guys think?! Do you think we're a little crazy to be doing stuff like this with two weeks left till my due date?! I keep saying I'm ready, but now I'm REALLY ready!! I'm so happy with the way these doors came out, and I'm SO THANKFUL for our privacy!!
Oral-B Pro-Health Clinical Pro Flex toothbrush $0.50/1
Please, stop GM wheat being grown in Australia and make sure overseas biotech companies don’t patent our daily bread.
Also, In my next update, I'll show you all the deco'd 3ds case I made! It's sweets inspired! complete with ice cream, biscuits and whipped cream. Yum~!
Emily folded her arms and continued to stare at me with a 'yes, you did' look.
5. Finally and the best rule of all..........have fun and spread the love!
Colleen Haggerty: A writer of creative nonfiction and memoir, Colleen has an essay in the anthology The Spirit of a Woman (Santa Monica Press) and another in He Said What? (Seal Press). She is an ambassador for the Prosthetics Outreach Foundation and created a walking campaign – to walk 100 miles in 100 days – to raise money for prosthetics limbs for people in developing countries.
I signed in and was admitted just this afternoon. The hospital is Second Wind Publishing (secondwindpublishing.com). Tentative release date for taking my baby home is July 15, 2012.
1 teaspoon freshly squeezed lemon juice
I'm exhausted.
Any good dog treat ideas?
VIVIENNE: Red. It’s a power thing.
Cover Art: Gordon Livingstone
The 7-year-old got a new bike--her first bike--and guess who forgot how freakin' exhausting it is to run next to a kid learning to ride a two-wheeler with no training wheels? I totally counted it as exercise--duh--even though I had to stop about every 30 yards because I thought I was having a stroke/heart attack combo. I am so out of shape. Yeah, that's at the top of my New Year's get-my-shit-together list, which is now about a mile long.
It was further reported that everyone who attended were given "money" ranging from RM50 to RM500, plus free transport and given food.
We're gonna have fun.
The commission's methodology is flawed, fundamentally so. The TRC failed properly to check the allegations on which it relied. It based key findings on untested and (effectively) uncorroborated statements that were sometimes mainly hearsay. It failed to comply with basic principles of fairness. It acknowledged that it was supposed to apply 'established legal principles' but in practice it exempted itself from them. It often relied on secret testimony and the self-serving allegations of criminals seeking to escape imprisonment. The quality and veracity of much of its 'evidence' was dubious. Yet it used this evidence to hold individuals and organisations accountable for what it depicted as premeditated murder-and did so without giving proper reasons to support its findings.
It is a form of happiness that has all the benefits, but not as much of a cost.
he walked off...i wish i would've followed him to listen to the mumbling i heard from way over here.
The Home Secretary is considering introducing “risk-based” airport boder controls:
Who knows how long we'll be out there... but I know I'd like to come back to Arizona and visit often. As much as I have always wanted to leave AZ, it's provided me with many good things - I've met 2 of my 3 best friends in Phoenix. The 3rd I met in Las Vegas while living in Phx, does that count? I met my beau in Phx. Some amazing friends who despite some downs have always been there and amazing folk that I am not worthy of. But most importantly Arizona brought me my 3 greatest loves and greatest joys... Burlesque, Bonzai, and Samurai. If it weren't for those 3, my life would be meaningless. They are the world to me!
Municipal funds on the other hand had another week of inflows, albeit a very modest one at $129 million based on Lipper FMI data. Almost all of that was to the high yield municipal funds sector. According to ICI this is the 6th consecutive positive inflow for municipal bond funds. Recent commentary from Cumberland Advisors:
Sense adds to Android’s usual lag
But very few of us will be satisfied with hoping that our government will not choose to exercise the power it’s been newly invested with. It’s a dangerous gamble.
Occasional reviewers have no participation requirement and, like the rest of us, receive no compensation other than review copies and a linked byline. If you would like to join our merry band please send an email to podpeep@gmail.com with a sample or link to a review you have written (or other evidence that would lead me to expect that you are capable of writing a book review).
down the sky.
Send ideas!
NOTE ON BASMATI: This is the best method for long-grain rice that I’ve found, always producing individual, and not-mushy grains of rice. Bring a large pot of salted water to the boil. Allowing 1/2 cup of uncooked rice per person, add rice to water (no need to rinse it ahead of time). For white basmati, cook at a boil for about 10 minutes; for brown basmati, boil for about 20. Turn off heat. Drain rice through a fine sieve, leaving a bit of the cooking water on the rice (that is, no need to drain really really well). Put back into the pot, cover with the lid and let it sit for about 10 minutes to ‘steam’ (although you’re not really using any more heat to cook it except for the heat of the pot and rice itself).
I was never the barkada type since high school. I was friends with a lot of people but I enjoyed the company of only a few close pals and I'd rather keep it that way. I'm so blessed for having these wonderful people in my life. They're always supportive and caring. You know you can run to them when life is much too cruel to handle. We always have each other's backs. There is no need for competition and definitely no pretenses. We all shine in our own special way and we let each other add a whole new color into our own lives. It's like there's really something for everyone. They're the most genuinely nicest set of friends I know and I wouldn't have them any other way.
James- "Doesn’t sound like he said anything about anything."
Fishkill, New York
How much vitamin D is enough?:
Lately I've found myself drawn more and more to midi and maxi dresses, not necessarily for the modesty factor, more so because longer lengths are just easier to move around in. Maybe it's me getting older, those granny tendencies kicking in? Either way, I like not having to worry about whether or not I'm flashing the world.
Eugene Kelly performed with Nirvana on stage at the 1991 Reading Festival and then subsequently he was asked to bring his new band on the road as support to the rock superstars as they criss-crossed the globe.
This new destination for adoration is Gardens by the Bay, a sprawling waterfront attraction set to bring out the inner butterfly, or bee, in anyone who visits. This post documents my privilege of being one of 25 photographers and bloggers invited for a special preview and sunrise shoot before the Gardens officially welcome visitors from 29 June 2012 onwards.
Jablonski letter to Kemp yesterday entered into evidence showing their desire that these proceedings not take place and that they would not participate.
Brothers Nathan and Aaron Weaver conclude the black metal trilogy they started with their staggering 2007 album Two Hunters, and its a worthy, appropriately apocalyptic conclusion. Wolves In the Throne Room have always blended their black metal sturm-und-drang with conventionally pretty female vocals (here, as on Two Hunters, provided by Jessika Kenney), a droning experimental sensibility, and an interest in structure that allows them to alternate the more pummeling, blistering stretches (like the harrowing "Subterranean Initiation") with restrained and even beautiful moments. Sandwiched in between the slow-burn 12-minute opener "Thuja Magus Imperium" (which moves from serene Kenney vocals to room-clearing tumult) and the aforementioned "Subterranean Initiation" is a curious sound art miniature on which Isis vocalist Aaron Turner chants, accompanied by scraping metallic noises. Later, on the appropriately named "Woodland Cathedral," Kenney's voice soars and keens over pulsing waves of feedback and Kosmische synthesizer sweeps. The band continues to experiment with sounds and approaches that usually fall outside the black metal aesthetic, incorporating the repetitive minimalism of early 2000s post-rock and the hypnotic synth washes of Krautrock into their melancholic, desolate sound. [buy]
I do have sister but she wasn’t my inspiration for the dynamic we are 12 years apart and very different. Megan and Morgan are patterned from my best friend. We have been friends for over 20 years and we have their same relationship. Where one of us has a weakness, it is the other strength and we can play off each other the same way!
The project will provide a combination of educational, development and recreational activities, and will support young males to achieve a tangible outcome such as increasing their life skills, transforming their behaviour, gaining qualifications, and re-engaging with education or employment.
It was a fast moving, but long week. Anyone feel the same? My Monday-Thursday is just craziness all around so it tends to fly right by for me.
This was my kind of sci-fi. An adventure that took place in a world I could understand, with characters kids can relate to.
And worthy seemed; for in their looks divine
Nor lose possession of that fair thou ow’st;
“So, are you saying you wouldn’t carry my baby?” she asked.
I think it is a shame that Michael Leunig’s work is not in print in the UK at the moment. The best chance of getting his books is on Abe from Australia. He is delightful.
Supplies.
Genre: Nonfiction
Question #1: Who “celebrates Halloween” weekend by taking the fam to the theater, donning 3d glasses, and seeing folks chop each other up???????
It’s only the beginning of the season but the fresh start has already stirred up some intense drama between the judges and one of the contestants. In episode 3 Louise Watts leaves the competition after a flaring contentious confrontation with the latest judge, Kelly Cutrone. During panel, Louise disagrees with Nigel Barker’s remark of her reflecting a ‘mean’ image from her photo. Kelly’s negative acceptance towards Nigels’s comment made Kelly Cutrone to voice out her opinion, which was ‘You should put some gratitude in your attitude’. The remark further offended the British contestant already wounded ego. Cutrone later added; ‘My experience on the set with you was that you were very condescending and rude to me, which I don’t really care about….’ To which Louise immediately says: No, no, no, no, no, you were rude to me’, which obviously caught all of them off guard. Louise’s outburst sets a tone of shock in the judging room as the contestant and the judges stared at each other in utter disbelief. Kelly Cutrone later said; ‘I’m done talking to you’ and Louise responded with; ‘fine’. Once it was clear that Louise could no longer digest all the critiques that was being unleashed at her, Louise storms out of the room and once she was outside, demanded to be sent home.
Latest: Alonso to Autosport.com ”I had nothing inside the cockpit because the system is not complete. We tested the engine cover to compare it with the standard one. I didn’t notice anything. I guess there will some new numbers from an aero point of view.”
This little bunny was one of the student’s children, she was so very cute sitting on the table with her outfit.
Today we make our Cheese Corn just like Great Grandpa did. We melt real cheddar cheese in special kettles to just the right temperature before pouring it on the fluffiest popcorn you’ve ever tasted. From our kitchen to yours, enjoy!
1/2 cup +2 tbsp cornstarch.
I evaluated my best selling items and re-designed them to incorporate patchwork. I love all of them ... I love them all more than any other version which tells me this is working for me and I trust for the shop too.
The famous New York Times was amongst the many offenders continuing to run dozens of heavily biased and guilt presuming articles almost to the point where the case, and their reporting of it, imploded in front of them. Times Sports reporter Selena Roberts was guilty of some of the more intemperate, hate infused, and prejudiced reporting in the early stages. Amongst other things Roberts asserted that "something happened on March 13" without acknowledging that this was taking the unproven charges of the prosecution and announcing them as fact. Furthermore, Roberts published false information about the case through the Times, such as "Players have been forced to give up their DNA, but to the dismay of investigators, none have come forward to reveal an eyewitness account." In fact, the captains' March 28, 2006 statement and the defense attorneys' subsequent press conference both described the captains' cooperation with police, and both occurred before Roberts penned her column. The Times never ran a correction. (Source Wikipedia)
11 Annex “B” of Petition; Rollo, 43-44.
4) The primary resident during the late 19th century was the banker William Putnam, better known as a significant trustee for the Brooklyn Museum in its early years. He betrothed to the museum paintings by Rembrandt and Monet, as well as some 'Royal Copenhagen porcelain' that rivaled that of European rulers, according to the Times.
We all know these things
We stopped for our mid-morning snack today and I served caramel popcorn. Junebug polished hers off quickly and came into the kitchen to ask for another bowlful. I eyed her for a moment and said, "I don't know...I think you're growing pretty fast as it is. Eating extra popcorn just might make you grow some more."
おわようございます。という間違えはよく見かけますが。（見たことないやろ）
My stomach terns as music starts to ring through the crowd, and the leader of our ‘fine’ city begins his speech. This week is the festival that is thrown every year in celebration of the day the door opened, the day our thousand year imprisonment underground ended. The day I was born. Tomorrow is the start of the celebrations. For one week the humans and the mutants will get along a little better, the crime rate will lower a little bit, and people will be seemingly happy. But at the end of the week when all the brightly colored decorations come down, and the shops prices go back up, everything and everyone will go back to normal. The hole thing is like a week long bandage that gets ripped off just to find the wound is festering underneath.
As always, I hope my presence is positive and inspiring.
PIYO: That has also been mentioned in the same report, putar.
Aqua Violet Beetle Juice
Unfortunately, I was having too much fun to take pictures.
For my last book I put together a collage I loved. It sat on my desktop screen as wallpaper and I looked at it every day. It had characters and bits and pieces of the story that were significant when I started.
The brief submission guidelines are as follows:
The parents, whose names were not published, were said to be exhausted by fending for their adult offspring, cooking his meals and doing his washing and ironing, according to the reports yesterday.
What about Easy Rider? Did that make me want to get on the back of a motorcycle and drive across America with a couple of degenerates while "Born to be Wild" blasted in my ears.
When maturity of the mind comes before maturity of the heart, you are in a position to grasp a lot. The transitional changes of a teenager to an adult is, by far, the most valuable lesson I have learnt. It doesn’t take much to hold your hold, and keep everything flowing the way it used. Its like sailing in a boat that already afloat. What’s hard, is to set sail to a new boat, get it to stop dwindling on the shallows, change the course of destination and let nothing stop your ambition. But maturity of mind does not come easily. You can’t just set your life before you, draft a plan and decide what part of it you are going to alter and what part you’ll leave as it is.
She wrote her first novel length story at the age of twelve and has written on and off subsequently, evolving her style and literary maturity. ‘Seven Point Eight’ began life as a short story in the early nineties and was later developed into a full five part series of books. Work on ‘The Second Chronicle’ has already begun.
But not only am I “lowering” my pedestal, I’m coming down off of it all together – just going to sit here off to the side safe and in tact while I laugh at all of the fools falling and breaking limbs. But then there’s the people way up top throwing rocks down at me and taunting me lol Whatev.
Couscous, often mistakenly called a grain, is actually a pasta made up of tiny pearls of wheat dough. To save time, purchase instant couscous, which has been presteamed and is ready in only a few minutes once combined with hot liquid.
Happy crafting everyone, and thank you so much for looking!
But I won’t. Guess you need to hope the world stays intact until then….
OG: 1.066
Next, I add a can of diced tomatoes, pinto beans...
Tel. +33 (0)1 77 32 49 69
These were added to my already considerable list of Kernel 'wows' which include the Coffee IPA, the original Black IPA, Imperial Brown Stout, something that was loaded with Galaxy and blew my face apart, Citra IPA, Imperial Stout, and S.C.A.N.S IPA.
There were no rules, there were no three (really, two) dominant genres, and game developers did not have the fat, clueless CEO and even stupider marketing "expert" breathing down their necks to develop YET ANOTHER FPS or RTS.
Not everyone gets “asparagus pee.”
As I've made abundantly clear, Dave already has a lot on his plate. With so many problems to address, I might not blame him if dealing with radical Islam isn't at the top of his to do list. It should be, but if everyone acknowledged the threat then there would be little need for the EDL. However, there is one thing he can do, one gesture he could make which we would demonstrate that he wishes to both abandon the personal attacks and purposeful misrepresentation that have plagued politics, as well demonstrating that he takes seriously the genuine dangers of Islamic extremism, radicalisation, fundamentalism, and Islamic Supremacism. He needs simply to denounce the one organisation that typifies the negative politics of the past: Unite Against Fascism (UAF).
R’IL’NAI: (group noun; singular is R’il’nian.) Alien beings, very human-like in appearance and capable of interbreeding with Humans. Non-aging past maturity but not immortal, with psychic powers and great empathy. Very low reproductive rate, with women ovulating about once a century. Women change from an androgynous appearance as ovulation approaches, but are sexually receptive throughout their cycle.
I sure hope you hop over and visit with Michelle today, makes sure you let her know we sent you.
Last year my students and I participated in the Disney Planet Challenge. It is an amazing program but requires a tremendous amount of class time. We (and I do mean we) learned so much about the environment. One of the activities we tried was called the 24 Hour Trash Task. I had the students tie a trash bag around their waist and put all their garbage in it for 24 hours. I participated in the task, too. It REALLY made you think before you threw something away.The next day we weighed our trash and then sorted it to see what could have been recycled. I think it was the most eye opening activity that we did.
I walked most of the steeper uphill parts after mile two, again trying to be more conservative in the heat and save my energy for the downhills. There wasn't any actual flat spots on the course, except for the 100 yard long bridge across the lake. It was an out and back course though, so every uphill eventually turned into a downhill. The worst part was that there was no water stops until well after the mile 3 marker. SO glad I carried my own bottle.
I was going to pair with black shoes but I love the nude look more! These pair of TB flats are one of my favorite pairs because they are really an everyday shoe. Makes the price-tag worth it! Or at least I will keep justifying it to myself.
Criticism of Pakistan’s response is harsh. The Pakistani state’s response to these crises, in turn, has been adequate thus far. Pakistan remains, for example, one of the top contributors to NATO forces and has a strong presence in Africa, particularly in Sudan and Somalia. On the other hand, of course, it remains silent-lipped on the issue of Omar Al-Bashir’s indictment as ruled by the International Criminal Court.
I still miss my family though. I always will.
"Follow that dream wherever that dream may lead"
It is a good rule and quite safe and is a rule I stand by and support 100%. I also tend to break it every so often. Read more...
Design inspiration comes from some of the most interesting sources. Recent case in point -- Justin Timberlake. And why not? He is one of the most creative forces on the scene so
This is the layout I created for this challenge:
And it's my sense that this also applies to people with a host of conditions such as dwarfism, Tourette's, and quadraplegia: we have insults for people with these conditions, and those insults are insulting coming from us, but within the community people use the insults and they're not being insulting.
Meanwhile, the phone kept me hopping. Friends, relatives, Realtors, and assorted other house sale related calls took up a good amount of my time amidst the cooking chores I had set for myself. I started two roasts in the crock-pot, then put the chicken on to cook, and in another pan began searing some meat for stew. By noon, I had the chicken chopped and part of it in a pot of chicken chili, the stew made and in the freezer, and everything ready to make hobo dinners for dinner.
They had no evidence to pin it on Lewis, but he was still a perfect patsy. The patsy only has to "work" for a period of time. Once the thing blows over, people get wrapped up in the next psyop and NO ONE CARES about the facts anymore.
Footpetals $5 off all orders over $25
Yahoo! Sports columnist Adrian Wojnarowski reports that Bruce Ratner talked to Russian oil tycoons about investing in Atlantic Yards, while a Middle Eastern group also expressed interest to the NBA and Nets ownership. Then again, oil revenues are down.
Let’s start at the beginning. Incursion figures, part of the Secrets of the Third Reich universe.
In recent weeks the garden has been a billowing mass of fruit blossom, everything from the clear white of the pears, the Merryweather (another lovely name) damson and the Victoria plum flowering for the first time to the pink flushed colours of the various apple trees. Even our greengage was covered and all are showing tiny fruitlets, almost as exciting as the wedding-like display with its seemingly endless confetti drifting down and filling the view from the windows.
Song of Treason was first published by Simon & Schuster in paperback last year – at least, under that title. Because as Jeremy explains in this blog post, it originally appeared under the title Free Country in 2010, the idea being that each of the three novels in the trilogy would have "Free" in the title (the third book was to be called Free World). Simon & Schuster, however, "felt there was a danger that Free Country might not signal to those who hadn't read the first book in the series, Free Agent, that it was a spy thriller". Jeremy agreed, and came up with the more apposite Song of Treason. (Incidentally, the novel was published as an ebook for the first time last week.)
All of that is cool.
A good way to save funds is to pare down or eliminate your cellular service. While many people may bristle at this idea, in truth, they all managed perfectly well without a cell phone in the past. Cell phones feel like necessities, but they are really more of a convenience. If you cannot get rid of your phone altogether, at least check your usage to find out if you can get away with a less expensive plan.
Footnote: like British Waterways, the Forestry Commission’s future is under review, to be ‘retain[ed] and substantially reformed’, with the Government announcing plans to sell-off much of the FC’s estate, at least in England – a different approach may be taken in Scotland, where powers are devolved to the Scottish Parliament. The possible effects are diverse and raise a number of concerns: will there be loss of public access, particularly where this currently may be on a permissive basis rather than as a result of designation as open access land under CRoW, or the presence of statutory rights of way? Will the work of the FC in promoting continuous cover forestry and mixed plantations be in vain if new woodland owners alter management practices in search of a greater return? Will amenity woodlands and those of importance for wildlife come under pressure to produce a profit for new owners? Are existing laws (such as felling licences) adequate and enforceable to prevent loss of woodland if ownership is transferred to a body that is not accountable to the public? Interesting, and potentially worrying, developments lie ahead……
Coral and aqua might be the trendy shades this season, but there’s one classic color that girls of all ages look gorgeous every summer.
And the last was Samantha Jane who is in 5th grade. I took care of her for the first few months of her life while her parents worked. It was so much fun to cuddle her and sing to her and do all the baby things. She used to climb on a chair reach my piano keyboard, punch a button for automatic play, and then dance to the music. She is now a very good soccer player. She was the child of Andy and Lori.
- No one. I’ve been in Bogdan’s these last few days. –
Chen exposed the barbarity of the forceful imposition of the inhumane idea that human beings are a burden on the resources of the benevolent State–and of the further idea that as the supplier of all resources, the State thus has the right to rid itself of such burdens. Invading the eternal, God-created wall of human dignity, the Communist government breached the most intimate parts of its women and stole from them babies whose composition had been knit mysteriously together in what ought always to remain a protected place—the mother’s womb.
Jodi Picoult and Chris Bohjalian, bestselling authors, also have chickens named for them. Wendy's chickens are egg producers. They will never be eaten. She promises they'll live the good life in rural New Hampshire. Well, they may have to go to school but they won't have to worry about their grades.
Each week the farmers bring the most seasonal offerings to the market. This week I purchased adorable, little new red potatoes. My mind was racing with so many ideas on ways to prepare these little beauties. Then I chose some sweet corn and in my mind I could immediately taste the sweet little kernels dripping in melted butter and sprinkled with a bit of salt to bring out even more corn flavor. Glancing back at my prepared list, I did pick up some summer squash, zucchini and my weekly brownie treat.
Seven miles later, making the turn off the main highway toward Stillwater I was finally able to turn the headwind I'd been working against most of the ride into a tailwind. I quickly found the "nasty hill". It was all I could do to get my bike stopped before the bottom where a steady stream of Saturday afternoon traffic on WI-64 had the right-of-way and I desperately needed to stop to avoid making the news. I was in serious jeopardy of losing it but managed to bale-out toward the shoulder of the oncoming lane. I definitely breathed a sigh of relief. The 1:50 point of the ride video catches the beginnings of the hill.
You mean so much to me I want the world to see,
The ads included a phone number you could call and listen to a message left by the advertiser, so we called both.
Basketball: In honor of March Madness, I decided I needed a sports themed quick takes with a twist. And speaking of basketball, I have never done a bracket as part of a pool. Well, this year we were moving the very week that brackets had to be done. At the very last minute, just before my husband took down our wireless, I quickly did a bracket in a pool with some friends of mine. I didn't have time to create one for the pool my family does. Oh well, maybe next year. In the pool that I am in, I am currently fourth, although I'm second by best possible score. We'll see what happens.
April 26, 2012
What stories would you tell
also, i need your help: i'm thinking about doing something fun along the back of the shelf but i can't decide what yet... leave me a comment and tell me which you like best :)
A couple of hours before the meeting, I caught the train over to the major suburb near the meeting venue. I did this to have dinner beforehand and give myself enough time to reach the venue (it was my first time in that area, so I wasn’t sure how long it would take to get there).
The characters were flawed and believable, but that doesn't equate to likable in all instances. The greatest character here by far was next door neighbor Ezekiel, a dark and mysterious man with an accent that I would have sworn was extinct. His tall and impossibly lanky presence cast a creepy shadow over every scene that he appeared in, and was almost a special effect in and of himself. He figures prominently in the plot, but was woefully underused when it came to screen time. His kitschy little catchphrases will be stuck in my head for quite some time.
There was a distant peal of thunder. Hermel felt the weight of the Dragon Stone pull his vest pocket downward suddenly. Star of Justice, who heard the thunder, thought that it sounded like the distant roar of a Dragon, and he remembered that Omri was said to be the ancient father of Elkor, the Great Dragon Elkron. He had a strange sensation.
1 income
... Valentine cookies Brenda baked for me on Monday.
* If what was taught in the patent involved too much work to be reasonable, allowing for all the circumstances including the nature of the art, the patent could not be regarded as an enabling disclosure. Phew, that's a tough one to blog, says the IPKat, but the principle is sound. His basic rule is this - if it takes longer to work out how to go about putting the patent into effect than it takes to understand what it's about in the first place, it should be void for insufficiency. Merpel says, it's such a nice word, insufficiency, but I just don't seem to find it anywhere in the European Patent Convention ...
“He has an artist’s cold, intense loathing for those who refuse to play soccer with the elegance and calm grace that he brings to it"; “a great artist’s unapologetic rage against mediocrity.” Looked at that way, Zidane’s epochal head-butting of Italy’s Marco Materazzi in the 2006 World Cup final may now perhaps be understood???
Free from watchful eyes, I will act on impulse, as I wish, never-minding consequence.
How fortunate that this weeks challenge should be about indulgence. Last week I was lucky to be invited to attend one day at the Battle for the Dragon competition, which is part of the Welsh International Culinary Championships, held this week at Llandrillo College. The competition also gave me the opportunity to use my Samsung P&S camera, small enough to take to events, rather than using a large DSLR.
I am on my way to my friend Md Asif’s house for dinner with my son, Aniruddh, and my wife, Meera, when my mobile phone rings. It is from my school friend Pramod as it shows on the mobile. (I had met him in Hyderabad on the 21st of December 2009 and we had a great time together after nearly 27 years! He met Meera and my son Aniruddh for the first time back then.)
The pale yellow woods were waning,
So, how did the dinosaurs go extinct?
Am I the only one that is sick of every character in books being perfect in every way? All the male characters were ‘perfect specimens of the species’. Evalle was wanted by EVERYONE. So beautiful and powerful and … yah that had my stomach turning. She got hit on by all the single guys. She was even kissed by two of them that didn’t even know her for more than two days. REALLY?
RZSVW Blog (rzsvwblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
are very close to my personal style, and The dress just fits right in to
You'll hear 15 different versions of Come Softly To Me on MusicMaster Oldies, along with almost 100 songs from The Fleetwoods, including a couple that were never officially released. Come Softly, and I promise you'll like what you hear!
Ribbon from stash, tied to a bow....
It was perfect because we are just finishing up graphing
Lips: Maybelline Pink and Proper
Customer care letter editor/writer - 110077704
The GSA is currently in the media spotlight. More accurately, the agencies lavish $823,000 conference (complete with $4 shrimp) in Las Vegas has been getting the attention.
There was a section with more hardcore stuff (yes more hardcore than metal vulva guards) that carried the warning “enter of your own free choice, you could be shocked (no complaints please).” I was very put off by this section – while a lot of the museum relies on shock value, of course, most of it is pretty decently curated whereas this particular exhibit was just ridiculously offensive, backward, and flat-out nonsensical. Case in point:
For his country, the little Uruguayan spearheads a three pronged attack. The system suits him, because he is flanked by similarly mobile forwards. On the rare occasions that Dalglish has started Suarez alongside Craig Bellamy, the pair look like they could establish a similar dynamic.
both of which she had not heard of before. Later this week she came to mind again, and so I sent her a link to Youtube to this particular song by Fernando Ortega…
*pretty (to me)
Now to the most important issue on hand- food! Today's recipe is another simple soup. What can I say- we have soup weather, although it is not quite as soupy here as some parts of the North-East US. This soup came together in minutes from whatever I had on hand in the fridge and freezer, and we enjoyed it so much that I decided it was blog-worthy.
Renovation is simply not about adding an extra bedroom or converting your attic, it is more than that. Any changes and additions to your existing house means, long-term changes that will affect your daily living. Therefore, home renovations should be planned and executed wisely. Here are some tips to help you
The lower house of parliament’s speaker Sergei Naryshkin said Monday that Putin submitted the bill shortly after his inauguration for a third Kremlin term.
Moving slowly
Tuesday evening, Margaux, Nicole, Abigail and I attended different candidate watch parties around Columbia. Margaux and I went to the incumbent’s watch party, since my other candidate wasn’t holding one. We spent a few hours talking to people who came, seeing what brought them out, their thoughts on the candidates and how they felt about the tax levy and bond issue. It was kind of fun to focus more on a series of quick, reaction-type interviews and to just talk to people about their thoughts. The superintendent and a former superintendent of the district also came, so it was kind of cool to talk with them in a more informal setting.
I can't believe how tight my muscles are from, really, close to three years of inactivity.
Michigan Inmate Curtis Jackson filed this motion with the State of Florida.
The The The beaten generation UK
A Wayward thought assailed me:
Copywriter Bob Bly discusses 8 Headline Styles that Work in his book, The Copywriter’s Handbook. While these are more geared towards bloggers selling widgets, services and companies, at least one of these will match your approach as an Indie Author in your sales efforts for your brand. Remember, you're selling your brand, not your book (even if all you have is one book, your publishing business is actually an Indie Author Brand). Look over the 8 styles in the list and choose one or more that sounds like you. For purposes of these discussions, let's assume all links lead to book pages.
I’m spiritual in many ways, but I’ve noticed most recently…
Mississippi had eleven infantry regiments, one infantry battalion, one cavalry regiment, and one artillery battery , sending over 4,900 men to Gettysburg, with almost 1,500 becoming casualties.
Seabeck is one of those towns.
The boy looked intently into his grandfather’s eyes and asked, “Which wolf will win?” The old Cherokee simply replied….
It depends on where I am. I work at a preschool, and half the moms are pregnant. I have to face it every day. It's hard. It's really hard to see everyday what I'm not going to get. I'm more angry when pregnant women are right in front of me.
I used a napkin adhered to my ATC base, added a border punched and added my Calligrapgy sentiment- made with Distress Ink and cut out, I added Sakura Gelly Roll Pen for shimmer on the letters and on the dragonfly.
- she loves technology. blame her daddy for that one. the girl cannot be in the vicinity of a phone, remote, or gadget with buttons without NEEDING to play with it. it becomes all she thinks about and all she wants to do. we've learned to hide things really well and others who come around eventually learn. :)
.A solider goes out and shoots 16..
The first was an outright cheat. She caught him in their bed at home with another woman. There's no explaining that away.
Tests- 88, Wickets- 362, Avg- 22.81, 5W- 23, Best- 8/58
I wonder about the hands that crafted the dove tailed corners. They are engineered and crafted in such a way that when it rains the water always flows to the outside.
In my life, many wars have I fought
What a fabulous creation Alison. You can find out how Alison made this over on her blog and she is also has some candy up to offer too, so please do stop by her blog. Thank you Alison for joining us as our GD for this challenge.
UPDATE: Skip Bayless finds grounds that an antitrust violation exists, because “over the past 20 or 30 years, millions and millions of taxpayers have been irate about the fact that we have no playoff system in college football.”
Coercive psychiatric treatment tends to have an adverse effect on patient empowerment because of the loss of autonomy and exclusion from participation. Forced medication management also limits a patient’s ability to choose safer alternative treatment options, or in some cases denies the patient completely of the right to choose alternative, integrative or complimentary therapies.
In a letter to Cassandra Austen dated 18th December 1798, immediately after Jane Austen's 23rd birthday, she made passing reference to her birthday.
$30 per person or $240 for a table that seats eight. 6 p.m. Aerospace Museum of Sacramento, 3200 Freedom Park Dr., McClellan.
Immerse yourself in its particulars.
Verse 7… “And lest I should be exalted above measure through the abundance of revelations, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, the messenger of Satan to buffet me” (KJV). This thorn was not given because Paul was conceited… I do not believe that Paul was a man who let revelations go to his head. He was given the thorn in the flesh because people were exalting him a little too much. Notice the word “lest”… People like to gather around ministries that receive revelations and visions from the Lord. It’s people like this who ruin ministries by placing them on a pedestal. The devil didn’t like Paul receiving praise and revelations, so he tried to kill him.
I used a free image by Cuddly Buddly Crafts called Happy Birdie. As per the twist; this was a bit of a challenge. Go figure.. I did not have feathers in my crafts supplies. I did three stores before I finally found some. I bought two packs to make sure this will not happen again.
(Still FRame courtesy Agora Archives Neederhuis Maastricht)
Kind of like..they forget how Boko Haram and Taliban commit horrible acts against Muslims and non Muslims alike when confront with the less pleasing realities of Islam. How when they promote Islam as a religion of peace, they forget how their beloved prophet raped children, tortured and murdered thousands of people. Either by his hand or command. It really is an honest mistake to forget that these things ever happened.
But the problem remains that while many women join companies from school or university, only a tiny number reach the top.
Now I was going to sort through some of my crafty stash for some candy but as I hop along blogland I see what a lot of people are loving at the moment & hey who can blame them, they are my fave digi's I love them soooooooooooo much I really do. I also know that there are peeps who havn't had chance yet to try these beauties so I asked the lovely Krista to draw me up a gift certificate to an amount that I thought would allow you to pick a good choice of images........
First of all, it is free and easy.
The major quirk of this film is that it is much like many other fraternity rival films (Van Wilder 2, Revenge Of The Nerds) — except in THIS one, it is the geeks who are the bad guys. (What a twist?) That’s really the only refreshing aspect of the entire movie. Everything else is basically something you’ve seen before, but done again differently. Which is fine by me. I love party movies.
Back to Valentines day. Yesterday.
Beattie
Ralph Salmins (drums)
Thwarted. Just five minutes away are two brotherhood bins, which I've donated stuff to before. They're on a main road and must be serviced often -there's not usually a load of excess stuff lying around them. I pull up, get out, start thinking about the logistics of 'posting' all these fricking books through the maws of doom, and become aware that some old guy has wandered over to tell me off.
The word on the street last month was that KPMG International was close to agreeing a deal whereby Treasury Holdings loans would be bought from NAMA, but it seems that for the time being at least Treasury is continuing to negotiate with NAMA. One of Treasury’s main corporate vehicles which it majority owns, Real Estate Opportunities (REO) PLC today reported its preliminary results for the year ended 28th February 2011, in which it confirms that it has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with NAMA but that negotiations are ongoing, presumably before the famed Heads of Terms and Final Agreement are concluded (“famed”, because last year before Ireland’s Committee for Public Accounts in the Dail, the NAMA CEO referred to three documents which comprise a full agreement with the Memorandum of Understanding being the first).
NO--
THIS STOPS THE APOCALYPSE
Before I get into the rest of it, yes, this is one of those found footage shaky-cam movies, and no, I don’t think it detracts at all from the movie. In fact there are several scenes which couldn’t have been done as effectively in a normal filming style and the handheld thing is handled really well.
I’m just asking for your prayers, for the wisdom and strength I need, for this time in her life and mine.
In a possibly over-simplified summary: Krauss said some things about philosophers with which some philosophers took umbrage; philosopher David Albert tore Krauss a new one in response; Krauss apologized, sort of; a variety of others have piped up, on one side or the other; and Carroll himself has assumed the role of mediator and tried to smooth everyone’s feathers. A significant part of the argument eventually condensed around the phrasing of the subtitle of Krauss’s book: Why There is Something Rather Than Nothing. Specifically, the issue is the apparent implication that Why refers to an explanation of purpose rather than function.
There is a tendency among the fitness and bodybuilding industry to believe that "starvation mode" is easy to enter and cause; that catabolism will occur the moment we stop keeping vigilant guard. This is simply not true, folks. In a study conducted by the NIH, the earliest evidence of a slowing metabolism occured after 60 hours of fasting.
In my teaching, I've learned these are essential signposts for each, which help the writer know how to section her manuscript--and if more or less is needed.
“People email me and then I meet them in town or explain to them how to get to our station,” says Deane.
The main cake was an Oreo Cake which was my white cake recipe with Oreos. If I could do that cake over I wouldn’t add as much crushed Oreos. It made it hard to torte and score and it change the texture of my recipe. I will research more into a better recipe for that cake. Overall I successfully matched the cakes with the theme of the party. Cream Cheese was the frosting.
There are, of course, many reasons for this well-earned and well-deserved success of Ferrante and Teicher, not the least of which is their impeccable musicianship, so very brilliantly showcased in the lush, string filled orchestrations which have become their trademark.
The Foreign Office put the document “Ethnic Diversity” in British embassies across the world.
Basically, this guy who I didn’t know (2,000 person school) had gone out of his way to REALLY organize his organizer. He had a key in the back, explaining his acronyms:
Brian "Stillwater" Strumke of Stillwater Artisanal Ales)
“Ohhhhh, America. Big country. Obama,” he said with a smile.
If he gets his tights on, even backwards, praise him.
Los Códigos de Tango (Tango Etiquette) has been protecting new tangueros/tangueras for over a century. (Newcomer to tango will need to read "Tango Etiquette's Apendix B for beginners" for vocabulary explanations.) The community should not see Tango Etiquette as the finer points of tango; it is the starting point. Tango Etiquette is not "the finer points of tango" but the basis of tango -- what teachers and friends should be pointing out to newcomers about about tandas, cabeceos, and appropriate behavior at a milonga. It will protect their advancement and make it hard for inappropriate behavior from predatory dancers to harm them. Here is a brief review in reverse order of priority:
Yesterday morning, I woke up to a message from this blog’s first designated Foreign Correspondent – comedian Bob Slayer - saying:
Breakfast. I know that this isn't necessarily one food, but this allergy thing has taken my favorite meal and turned it into my dreaded time of day. I'm starving, know I need to eat to keep my calories up for breastfeeding and feel like there is nothing good to eat that doesn't involve these foods. I can't wait to have cereal (so sick of rice chex--this is the only cereal that I've found that doesn't have whole grains), oatmeal, scrambled eggs and french toast. What do you all eat for breakfast? Am I just forgetting a yummy breakfast food I could be having because I'm too hung up on the others? I try to do smoothies every once in awhile but I hate cleaning the blender. Laziness wins out.
In another dish combine bread crumbs, herbs and garlic powder.
He is the giver of peace,
Existing legislation defines a living wage in New York City as a minimum of $10 per hour with benefits, or $11.50 per hour without benefits.
The festival of birthday begins today with watching the Preppie in a class performance at school assembly, and then we have the sisterlyopshoppingpalooza (I'm sure that's a real word), and lunch at my favourite cafe (sorry pulmonary rehab, but I'm ditching you today)!
1:Martin Prado- good price and hits Hammel’s well.
thrown in (with their unnatural hunger
Change is what we say we want but as the change happens we say we don’t. Change is scary.
And all I want is to go home now and thank my wife again who bought me this ticket—no matter how much it cost- out of pure love.
For the Pistachio Swiss Meringue Buttercream:
Now for the REAL story - the confession. This is more than just, "Oh, I've been traveling so much I just didn't have time for the garden..." like I blithely posted about last week. I honestly don't want to be out there anymore. My heart and mind and creative force are dedicated to writing my story now, and to making music when the opportunities arise. The only reason I'm pulling weeds whenever my friend Steve can come over to help me is that I feel a responsibility toward it. I can't stand to look outside and see that kind of overgrowth. The effort seems like I'm only maintaining an old dream.
Sometimes there are powerful instinctive drives pushing us toward one outcome, and formidable human longings or daunting weaknesses directing us toward another, and the ultimate outcome is not reliably predictable with humans. It is with considerable trepidation that through these drives and longings, we may anticipate the possibilities of a deeply personal experience of connection, as well as the loss or deprivation of those experiences. My heart and mind seem to fly swiftly toward such souls in the isolated landscape of the human spirit, and although I cannot say with absolute certainty exactly how such connections are even possible, my own spirit floats effortlessly into the night, toward such souls whose very existence stirs my heart to flight. Though distant in time and space, we breathe the same air and feel the same sun on our faces. The sigh of exhilaration which fills my lungs with air, and my spirit with joy, can also come with a price. The disruption in the fabric of the soul can carry with it an almost reflective pain upon separation, and it is this disruption which can confirm even more powerfully the existence of such connections.
If you took a Brainbench exam yesterday and got an error message instead of a results page, please check your email to see if you were emailed a copy of the results. Some of you were emailed copies and unfortunately some were not. If you received a copy of the results, please print that one copy of the email for your records.
Other than the fairly entertaining concept that while it’s an anthropomorphic cat, he still acts like a cat sometimes (blatantly stolen from Dug’s squirrel obsession in ‘Up’), not interesting. Not funny. Not engaging. Just a stupid movie that is nothing more than a cash grab. And Humpty Dumpty was really weird.
Why don't you sign up to our Newsletter........lots of insider information and even the odd offer.
You will still be able to find old posts at ohiomedia.blogspot.com, but no new content.
The only way their smears can have the desired effect is if they are lucky enough to be smearing a hyper-sensitive soul who reads everything written about them by their enemies on the internet and then seeks to address each and every smear - often on the forum on which it appeared, which will invariably be controlled by a hostile entity. This only encourages the keyboard warriors behind the hate campaign and makes their vile campaign of harrassment worthwhile.
Last week was registration for the coming year at the Be All and End All Academy. We loaded up on books (snore, snore) and spirit-wear (rah-rah!). Before we went another step further, I insisted that we put Nick’s name, in ink, in each and every one of his nearly $500 worth of text books. When we went through this ordeal last year, Nick grabbed my ball point pen, snapped off the clip and jammed it into the “lock” of his locker. Politely, I inquired about what he was doing and he explained that if he jammed the lock, he would never have to go through the trouble of opening his locker all year. Yeah, I don’t think so. Get rid of that pen cap! This year on our way to his locker, Nick realized that he could not remember the combination. I mean really, how could he possibly be expected to have this information at his fingertips? He’s only had this locker for two years, and it’s not like he’s had to open it over the past ten weeks. After he was reacquainted with his combination, we set up shop.
I love words that tell stories and words that tell facts like science magazines and discovery channel .. for example. I don’t like mispronounced Vedic Chants, misrepresented facts, political speeches and otherwise incoherent, unverified claims, especially insults. I like the sounds of birds and frogs.
So, after the appointment I did what I normally do, which is call everyone who has asked to be updated about OLBOJ. While I was talking to my father, he mentioned that he was born at 9 pounds 11 ounces.
It's Kat's birthday today, and I managed to pull off a little surprise party for her. I'd outline all of the careful omissions and lies I had to tell in order to do it, but I've honestly lost track of them all at this point.
Upham Ale - (Bitter) 4.0% ABV
Special thanks to our panel of judges, Marina Zelner, Tiffany Braxton-Belvin, Madeline Figueroa-Jones and Steffany Bready-Edwards! Your task was definitely challenging and we thank you for your selection.
Oh...and one more thing....thanks to April....our server...who kept us happy and hydrated all day! You are the best....the only server I saw that took a turn in the dunking booth. And thanks to Josh...for being so nice and to the owner for allowing us to peddle our wares for a day! We definately will stop by the Nav A Gator whenever we are in the area and enjoy a cold one!
Alô Gee Family!!
Ava: Hey Eliza, does Santa Clause sin?
So even though this is the VERY poor evidence that Hyrum was student of the month....we were there and I don't have to feel like the LAMEST MOM EVER because I ALWAYS miss these!
GC: Out of all the roles you’ve played, obviously to me, you will always be General Hancock, so what first attracted you to take his role for Gettysburg in 1993?
“And Friday?” Another function.
Tulisa made the unusual decision to ditch the skyscraper heels and wear flat shoes onstage in order to perform the energetic choreography – a move perhaps to be admired for her practical, down-to-earth approach, and one you would never see most other starlets doing.
Manhattan crowds, with their turbulent musical chorus!
With two Halloween layouts done I would normally only have one more to go. But this year I too will need a Halloween layout - I dressed up for the Halloween Chili Cook Off at work. This was my Charlie Chaplin get up! I liked how the costume came out and I love that other than the hat and moustache the costume was put together with things we mostly had at home!
Drain pasta and cool with cold running water. Drain again and add to stir fry. When the pasta is coated and the sauce is slightly thickened, it is ready to serve.
Near complete
We cry to Thee this morning for the preservation of Thy church in the
3 T fresh lemon juice
It’s hard to believe that it was 4 years ago that my Mom joined my Dad in heaven. The months leading up to her passing in some ways were so long while in other ways it was much too quick. How fortunate I am that the last words I said to her were “Hey Ma, I love you.” I am so very blessed to have be able to say that to her.
“Criticism from the positive perspective is good. However, the criticism would be meaningless without suggestion for improvement,” he stated in his address when officiating at a briefing on the proposed Baram hydroelectric dam at Kampung Na’ah, Baram, some five hours land journey via logging roads from Miri city, last Friday.
6) In his last couple of paragraphs, Reilly again twists logic to it’s breaking point:
2. Unknown Artist - Play Girl - main theme
I’d always devoured movies growing up, but as a child of the late '70s, most of my film diet consisted of late night cable and local UHF Million Dollar Movies. I lived in the suburbs, and the local video stores didn’t really provide a diverse menu (though I managed to be baffled and intrigued -- and, at the time, bored -- by Stalker at 15 or so). So, for example, my first viewing of Seven Samurai was on the day I moved into my dorm at Penn State (we got IFC on campus cable). I fell asleep.
Cravings/Aversions: Last night, I told Justin that I really wanted pizza for dinner. He basically said that we just don't have an eating out budget this month (which is totally true, and yes, it's our mutual policy to hold each other accountable about budget stuff like that). And I snapped back that pizza was the only thing that I could possibly eat that night, and that if I couldn't have pizza, I wouldn't eat anything at all. Yes, it was quite melodramatic, and came out of my mouth before I even knew what I was saying. Needless to say, Justin told me to up a $5 pizza from Little Caesars, and it was delicious. And it'll probably come out of my grocery budget, but it'll be worth it.
Day 28: Have you ever corrected or wish you corrected someone about your loss?
I did not deal with frustrating criticism from a boss but I did deal with criticizing myself and some actions that I am not proud of.
We took down the coat hooks and I painted the walls Celtic Gray. I'll probably save the trim for later. ;) I plan on spray painting the coat hooks the same metallic paint that I used for the kitchen cabinet hardware.
Sarah Palin’s coming to town
Wow!! Something beautiful. It’s hard to imagine that anything beautiful can come from pain or chaos. And yet, there it was on the computer screen yelling back at me. Something beautiful! And without hesitation, I knew it was God reminding me to be the good and faithful servant. I knew he was there with me. Just as He is there with you!
Cumin powder- 1 tsp
mortgage payments not having been paid for 6 months. After having to go to
And now a father shows to his daughter a blurred picture of his work projected on a big screen in a room filled with people. His daughter feigns the feigning of interest. Yet somewhere in her eyes he sees the flicker of a little girl who is proud of her daddy. That's what you took. And I may well be a cunt who had it coming, but I am a cunt who tells the truth.
I sit alone in the dark and wonder if they really believe the people will swallow this line. All along people have been demanding to hear Maurice speak for himself and there's no sign of that being allowed to happen. They're not allowed to talk about what's going on in case they're arrested for spreading rumours and they're not allowed to demonstrate. They've gone from being in control to being controlled. And they're expected to just accept their new status? Surely, those who now are clearly the ones holding the reins of power must know that's not going to happen ...
If you are a new mommy, maybe you shouldn't read this. But Scary Mommy explains how the sleepless nights never really end. Parenting does not get better.
After dinner, the volunteer parents would take their places at the activities set up in the class rooms, and the doors would open to the carnival, proper.
updated...... the card does stay upright.you need to make sure the card is heavy weight and then you create an oval easel shape the same as a normal easel card.the 2 outer ovals are then attached to the main middle oval of the easel.
And just when I started feeling really sorry for myself, my phone rang. It was Mr. Stupid.
Engagement Type: Contract
17Cursed is he who takes his neighbour’s landmark from its place. And let all the people say, So be it.
Girl1: I warned her you guys are always talking about boozing, shagging and your penises, and that she ought not to be offended. After all, it is a secular company, and you guys do a great job of offending all creeds equally.
This compilation also includes some lines of ecological verse, such as this bit from Ben Jonson:
Hey guys. I have a card for you today and I combined it with yesterday’s FFC, so it’s a two-fer. But it counts because Sherry is on the Etsy Inspired Design Team too :)
1 oil's
Let's see. . .
John Lennon
Unfortunately, I have discovered that Cathy is quite cutthroat about sewing contests, once even suggesting we send Laura Mae wool knit containing moth larvae. I think the modeling industry makes you this way, frankly; there's so much backstabbing it's practically ballet.
We saw all of the famous Cathedrals and churches, well not all of them because there are hundreds, but all of them that count. Do you want pictures? Repeat after me: Ya hatchu photograph. I think that’s pretty close.
To enter I just let me know either by commenting here on the blog, or on my Facebook page, what you think the next theme in my kids party range should be. Two winners will each receive a $20 voucher for any of my products.
Party Time came with me. We dandered round there 8.15 in the morning. The sun was coming up and above the gulls circled and cackled. Unfortunately Party Time has lost his native linguistic exoticism and now those beautiful phonetics of his have been stripped of their beauty just like...a village of dusky tribeswomen molested by clap ejaculating conquistadors...just like an actor out on loan, on a daytime soap opera, who's required to present with a exotic accent but who can't keep it up – who the producers hope can revert back to linguistical terra ferma while the viewing public don't notice. He now speaks, Party Time, with a voice the sound of which falls somewhere between Johnny 'Mad Dog' Adair and Paul Rankin.
So with A: As a result of living out my Soccer Mom years earlier than most, I pushed myself to have a more interesting experience in my 20's. With B, I don't think I'll ever become "born again" but I DO think I'll be a spiritually curious (and hopefully respectful) person going forward. And C -- if I never had boyfriends who sucked, I never would have found Ross! It took a lot of losers to make me appreciate the grand, knight-in-shining-armor winner, which duh, is how it always play out, right? Who gets that kind of thing right on the first try? On the tenth try?
The beers are currently being sold in the Village Inn in Arrochar and have been sighted in the Bon Accord and Pot Still in Glasgow too. The brewery is also in talks with a well-known department store about stocking bottled beer. I think bottling is a smart move – what tourist at Loch Lomond wouldn’t want a bottle or two of local beer?
Last week I was told I was too old to wear t-shirts with anything printed on them. Plain tee's are all that are left for me. When I questioned the rule, I was told because I didn't immediately tell them to mind their own business I didn't "own my choices" and that proved I shouldn't be wearing them. Until that moment in time it had never occurred to me that people might think I was trying too hard to look young by wearing a t-shirt with a SF saying on it or a wine comment. They just made me laugh and I just thought my other SF friends would get a kick out of it. Will I wear the T-Shirts again? Yes. Will I ever feel as happy wearing them as I did before? No. No matter how much I say other people's opinions don't matter, there will always be a small part of me that wonders who is judging my outfit and deciding I don't measure up.
Today is an international day of remembrance for people lost to suicide, particularly young people who killed themselves after being bullied or forcibly outed for their sexual orientation. Wear purple in their memory. Speak up against discrimination when you see it. Tell the kids in your life that you love them no matter what, and refrain from hate speech that might cause them to doubt that.
Hall would also be known for a rather alarming law briefly on the books in 1855. The state had outlawed the sale of alcohol in the entire state. Under advisement of mayor Fernando Wood (who wanted to please hard-drinking Irish voters), Hall constructed a law allowing for unencumbered liquor sales, seven days a week, in the two months before the prohibition was to take effect. May and June of 1855 were the booziest months in New York City history.
■Farmer’s Neighbor #4
Now, I never claimed it was health food (although I do use ground turkey instead of the ground beef used by my grandma and mom) but, I promise its yummy!
Some vampires going into the room shoved her from behind, breaking Addison out of her temporary paralysis. Looking down, Addison wiped at a few tears that clung to her wet cheeks as she avoided their angry stares.
- Grilled radicchio salad, maytag blue cheese, walnuts & maple balsamic dressing with New Belgium's Fall Wild ale (dubbel spiced with Schisandra berries, then fermented with Trappist yeast & brettanomyces)
“Safe enough,” his companion said easily. “You are surrounded by friendly faces, and you are many miles away from the desert. Nothing can harm you here. Be calm.”
After a 3hr lesson, and a LONG paddle on Reid Lake, John taught us all about the different types of kayaks that are available, and shared the story of how he came to turn his passion for kayaking into a business.
Royal Scottissh National Orchestra-Georg Tinter
The actual list of new features that falls under each of those categories is quite extensive (see the PES website here) so I shall shorten it down so it is easier for you to read and understand which a really long series of paragraphs may not be. I shall begin with ‘PES FullControl’, which gives players more freedom in areas such as ball control and trapping the ball.
- Fresh chicken breast boneless skinless $6.99/lb ($15.41/kg, Eating Right)
This picture was taken one week after I dunked those little white nasties in water. And look what happened! I felt like I was in my own little mini-mythbusters episode.
I feel so relieved now, yet at the same time, I am still very sad. My internet friends have become in-person friends, and there is someone that I love deeply that knows what I need, and that I am in need of support and she has given that to me unconditionally without knowing my full story. I love her for that.
In 2002, the World Health Organization announced that evidence is emerging to show that even lower doses of lead than previously thought could cause neurological damage in children. A spokesperson said that virtually no level of lead was safe and that measures needed to be taken to remove lead from the environment.
I have also been keeping up with my Bee blocks..
There is a big 50% off sale at the store going on this weekend June 3-5, too! You may want to head over there after the hop or right now to get that image that you have been wanting to enter Daisy's challenges. June 15th there will be a mini challenge at the DD Creative Challenge blog ...a Daisy Doodles image must be used to participate and win a gift certificate to the store!!
Last year I decide to add a Xmas tree in the back porch/laundry room, guest bathroom.
That is not joke money in rent that the PNM refused to collect you know? That is more money than Kamla 2 oil beaker making. Me woulda shame!
The first mode is the New England industrial model, which spread west to the Great Lakes early on and trickled gradually southward from there. It’s one of the shibboleths of modern thought that industrial systems create wealth, but as Alf Hornborg points out usefully in The Power of the Machine, their main function is actually to concentrate wealth; the wealth that would have gone to a large number of small proprietors and skilled craftspeople in a nonindustrial society goes instead to the very small minority with the money and political connections to build and run factories, control access to raw materials and energy resources, and the like. That’s why every nation on Earth that has ever built an industrial economy within a free market system has ended up polarized between vast fortunes on the one hand and an even vaster number of hopelessly impoverished workers on the other. That’s the New England model—it was also the English model, but that will be relevant a bit later on—and it drives a very specific kind of imperial expansion, in which sources of raw materials, on the one hand, and markets where industrial products can be exported, on the other, are the central targets of empire.
The years between 1958 when Jake "George" Epping first goes into the past until 1963 when he must stop Oswald are described in detail. His journey from Maine to Florida and finally to Texas are peppered with harmonies of where he's been and where he's going. The side story of his journey, which turns out to be a main plot, is his meeting of Sadie, the new school librarian. He and Sadie quickly fall in love but their relationship is far from blissful.
is the power of these voices that can guide you to find your own door,
22. Who'll Be The Man
If this is too much, then just buy a few cans of the white frosting. You will need a small amount of blue for the eyes, white for a thin base layer and peach for the skin color (1 drop red: 3 drops yellow).
So start somewhere; a fresh page, a fresh screen, and don’t stop. Write anywhere. Any time. Just write.
So the day after the wedding, before Amma and myself left for Delhi,my cousin Rosily found out that the caterers for Madhuramveppu had a restaurant closeby to where we were staying. That means, they will have the same dessert on the menu!! So without wasting another minute, we set out to finding Ernesto's.Making sure we saved some space for the much awaited dessert, we had a small lunch and then gorged on 2 full bowls of Serradura.Then we rushed back to the hotel to pack our bags and catch the next train to our respective destinations with one thought in our minds,'Get the recipe for this dessert!'.
I will do any job and work hard
Torchwood: Exodus Code will be released on November 6th 2012.
Weeks passed and a third postcard arrived. It was from the Amazons and it said:
As I have not bust a nut in nearly 3 months I have trawled the interwebs many times over – looking under every rock and through every cache dump for good porn that I have not already seen. I feel much like those hard pushed trawler men, squeezed by EU regulations and despairing over the depleted stocks – they work the same land, float over the same space, and come up with the same shit, maybe many times over.
Berry: “You can play with pee, but you cannot play with poo. It’s yucky. You can make eyes with pee, and smile with pee and play with pee. Put a hat on pee and take pee to the park.”
* 1 Package of Mixed Flowers
-Mineral Crystal
Several months ago he filed for disability from the service, not thinking that he would get 100% disability. But he did, and he received a settlement of back pay from years ago.
DON’T FORGET – We will hold our monthly WMS Blog Party this coming Tuesday. Our theme for April is New Beginnings, and if you need further details, check out this post. We all hope to see you then!
Finally, speakers will focus on : how to acquire new kinds of art; exhibition problems; storage and maintenance (e.g. ephemeral or self-destructing works); technology changes and reproductions problems; obscene and blasphemous works; merchandising; loans; reproductions in catalogues.
until her head arched
Well, this is a really difficult one to answer! Every week I’m totally surprised to find I’ve liked this week’s chapters more than the last – even though I really liked the earlier parts as well! I’m particularly enjoying watching Vin’s development. Not only is she becoming more confident in her own abilities but she’s actually starting to enjoy the company of the rest of the crew and to feel like a part of something. She even had a brief spell of reflecting about her brother and wishing he’d had a chance to experience something similar. I like the fact that she likes Elend and wants to think the best of him and will actually come straight to the point and ask her questions. But, I like the most the interaction with her and Sazed. Their discussion in the library was good to read and I also liked that she actually asked Sazed before she used her allomancy when following Elend at the last Ball she attended – they both seem to be developing a mutual trust and it’s good to see.
To wrap it up:
And Color Create makes me want some ice cream with those yummy colors they choose for their challenge # 17: lemon, pink sorbet and chocolat. Mmmhh. Seems like my lemon turned a bit into vanilla.LOL
1 overlords
In its heyday, this ad campaign was so popular that you could get all sorts of paraphernalia, declaring that you indeed were a Pepper too, including T-shirts, coffee cups, and lunch boxes.
We are the army of one;
When I finally get up to Pennsylvania to meet her, I'm also looking forward to visiting the shop next door, The Rosemary House and Gardens herb shop founded by Nancy's mother Bertha and now operated by her sister, Susanna Reppert Brill. It's no wonder herbs often appear in Nancy's tea room recipes, and the flavor combinations in this cookbook have my mouth watering: Baked Herbed Cheesecake, Garden Fresh Herb Scones, Orange Rosemary Cake and so much more. The cookies with basil begged to be tried first, and happily, Nancy generously gave permission for me to reprint the cookie recipe for you here! This is a new favorite at my house, and I can't wait for the next time I'm called on to bring cookies to an event.
And we made it there! Finally! It's about ten hours of straight driving, but with the amount of stops we make, it took us much longer.
183 5. “Notes Toward an Apologia pro vita sua.” Interpretation, vol. 10, pp. 319-52 (May & September 1983).
I love to watch elephants walking along a well trodden path. The rhythm of their gait, and ears flapping like sails catching the wind, remind me of giant galleons on a course at sea.
I can't believe it has been two weeks since I wrote a blog post! It's crazy how time flies (when you're working to much).
Oh boy I just received a check in the mail for $3,990.00!!! It looks like the real thing and came with a letter from G.T.Express Financial Services Inc. in NY, although the check itself has Presbyterian Village in Little Rock, AR on it as the owner and it came in an envelope postmarked Little Rock with no return address. Hmmm, time to investigate.... Oh yeah, the check is to go towards the "applicable Government Service Tax (GST) payable to the Revenue Department through your assigned tax agent" so I can get my $120,000.00! Sheesh! If only....
If I can't give him just two measly minutes what am I teaching him? I want him up know that his opinion is wanted, that his word is important, that we respect him and have time for him no matter how big or small the situation or comment is. I don't want him to EVER lose confidence is us.
What has it profited me to serve you?” Instead, he said: I was in the
Further down the road another bull elephant stood splashing mud over his body from a pool next to the road. He cared little about us, but continued splashing each and every part of his body, swooshing his trunk over his face and eyes. Another bull arrived. They were clearly pals and greeted each other with gentle trunk waving, inserting the tip of the trunk into each others mouths. The second bull began the same procedure. As they parted ways again - one to the shade, the other on another path - there was an interlude of parting gestures - gentle trunk caressing of ivory.
Thoughts from the rabbit hole: Likeable characters and a fantastically well-constructed tale. Just wish there was more of it!!!
“It is important for us that Zanu-PF regains the lost ground and again represent the interests and aspirations of all Zimbabweans. We must fight the imperialist project because if it succeeds here, we are all in trouble.”
I was so relieved I was secondarily appalled by it.
Yoko Ogawa, The Housekeeper and the Professor, translated from the Japanese by Stephen Snyder. A short, sweet novel about the relationship between a mathematics professor, his housekeeper and her young son. Due to a brain injury, the professor’s memory is limited to 80 minutes and all new experiences must fall within that time frame.
This critter REALLY looks unfinished...I must insist that you give yours more features than I gave mine! Try thinking beyond just eyes, nose and mouth...
The main goal is to have fun and follow the blogs that interest you!
As in almost all instances of slasher films, the antagonist generally suffers from one form or another of childhood trauma and Christmas Evil is certainly no exception.
Seema was represented by senior counsel Colin Gonsalves and the State of Rajasthan was represented by Additional Advocate General Manish Singhvi.
Pat: I’m still trying to find a traditional publisher, using an agent, for both of my two new books. One is a middle-grade book, and the other is adult literary fiction. If my agent can’t sell them, I’ll probably look at smaller publishers, but I’ll also consider publishing them myself as e-books. I want my material to be read, and it’s clear that e-books are one way to help that happen.
-Three days in July in Maine, primarily tony Bar Harbor.
Details :
We start to relate differently. We are not as impatient or prone to make judgments on people. We desire restored relationships and renewed bridges.
I was born and raised in Tennessee. I chose to come back here after college. Like B, there are absolutely things I love about this state, from the big beauty of the landscape to smaller pleasures of local businesses and institutions and people. It’s not all about politics – but our politics are seriously messed up here right now.
In a world of hoping for a chance –
I Wish I were a Princess...Little Peggy March
In order for Skype and services like it to become similarly ingrained in the lives of their users, they need to make some bold changes. Microsoft has recently been advertising positions on a team that will be working toward bringing the “Skype experience on to the Web.” By providing users with access to the service without requiring the installation of third-party software, and through much-increased exposure, Microsoft is almost guaranteeing itself a raft of new users. Plus, making Skype browser-bound will provide the ability to add hooks into many other web services, making it the service of choice through mere access and convenience.
A full refund and they did it with a smile on their face.
For novels, I loved Orhan Pamuk’s Snow at the beginning, but ultimately it proved the hardest book for me to complete this year. Its wonderful magical realism was broken by a main character full of melodrama and narcissistic yearning for happiness. I had similar troubles with Jonathon Saffron Foer’s Everything is Illuminated, a clever, heart felt search for family that becomes a little tedious with its overblown textual trickery. After the Foer, I finally, after years, made it to George Eliot’s Silas Marner, a beautiful enough story to queue up Middlemarch as something to read in the future. Admittedly, it reads as a bit quaint in contemporary times. I struggled and eventually gave up on Phillip Roth’s Great American Novel, though I loved Goodbye Columbus years ago and have The Plot Against America on my list for 2008.
perfect size for scraps
On the What's Hot lists for all of Fantasy and Historical Romance
I feel like the only thing worse than all your light fixtures "matching" is a combination of three that are completely unrelated. I wanted them all in the bronze to black color family. I was looking for something simple but substantial enough to carry the room. I came across this one at Pottery Barn and thought it would work but of course the price changed my mind. We're talking a total of $350.28 after tax and shipping. Below is the picture from their website.
HOLY FUCKING SHIT
In addition, though their bonuses have fallen from stupendous to merely disgusting, bankers are still giving themselves rewards for their own services out of all proportion to their usefulness to society or their shareholders.
Imagine if they can talk and communicate like us , definitely they will bring the case to “Court” & to fight for justice. Right?
My sister is happy. She is choosing her lifestyle, so that is cool. I am happy and consistently trying to be happier by worrying less, loving myself more (insert obligatory pleasuring oneself jokes here) and making sure I’m living the life I want to live. So it’s all good.
I swear.
My hope with this blog is to, one, share my experience and, two, more importantly, also share documentation, articles, and evidence about this one particular example of insidious corruption, disregard for human life (on behalf of Pfizer, Parke-Davis, pharmaceutical industry salespeople and psychiatrists), and concern for profit (as Neurontin was about to go off-patent, Parke-Davis did not want to wait for, say, scientific studies or FDA approval, because they wouldn’t make any money off any of the illusory benefits they concocted), as an illustration of the fact that: this is de facto class warfare against us. The rich are killing us, through lack of regulation, through economic warfare, through the unprecedented conspiratorial theft of our country’s wealth by a fraction of the population so small that it boggles the mind.
How do you know Cara? I know her from NaHaiWriMo and from there I know her blog. I also know her from the Shiki Kukai and have been coming across her name here and there in the “haiku-territory”.
Oleths – See Oleyl Alcohol.
One of the best methods is to sit down with your ms and a notepad. Note down what happens in each chapter, so that you have the entire book in summary. Look out for the various themes and make a note of them – this knowledge will be invaluable when you write the synopsis.
Your colour this month - Mahogany
Today is my Dad’s birthday!
The Silent Auction begins at 10 a.m. and all proceeds from Celebration of Hope go directly toward The Salvation Army’s Christmas programs and other Salvation Army programs throughout the year. Sponsors are also being accepted.
Look at all that hair! I love the colours, and the white halo around her. I’m a bit confused as to what the blue thing on the right is in between the strands of her hair; it’s clear she has a blue shirt on, but does it have a giant puff at the front that protrudes all the way up to her chin? Or is that supposed to be her shoulder? Either way, it looks a tad akward. Anyways, I love Barbie stuff from the 80s and early 90s. Her hair and clothes were the best then, and also the font of the Barbie logo was much nicer than some modern versions I have seen.
Yep, 29. I mean, should I post all or cut try to cut it down? If I post all, I have a feeling you'll just be bored and completely stop reading. Or if I try to cut it down, I might be excluding something that could be important. After all, this is a life changing post. What could be more important than learning how I make Avenger Cupcakes? Do tell :)
Writer: Tom O’Connor
Understanding the History
And I left with some fancy purple wrapping.
He left his dreams to wait
Indeed, as many as 44 percent of its users now could be so-called ‘ghost users’ who don’t log even log in once a month, as you can see in the chart below from news.livedoor.com:
I much prefer running outside....well along a nice flat path, preferably gravel.....but sometimes I find the need to run at the gym on the Treadmill. Mostly because I need the free childcare, I mean I am not speedy, but my 5 year old can't keep up with me and quite frankly, my exercise is ME time.
Obama: How come you're talking about the second one again?
I really like these to have a professional finish, so if you have metal eyelets available to you, punch holes through ALL 3 layers BUT only insert your eyelets on the top tab and the front section of your template only (so the back panel will have a punched hole, but no eyelet inserted....). If you don't have metal eyelets, a hole made with a paper punch will do fine (just not as hardwearing).
B4) Little Howie - See Sid Deh
If you have not done so far, do please check out the blogs of the following friends who are also participating in the 30 days blogging honesty ~( via @TomBaker ) This initiative is due to Tom and CherlynCochrane
'To be honest' said spokesperson 'we were very UNDERWHELMED, especially after seeing all those glowing reviews on TRIPADVISOR'
We are woken up at 6am with a cup of tea. We get up and have breakfast which is omelettes, porridge and toast. We then head off for our hike. Today we are only hiking 10 km. However, this hike is called the “gringo killer” (tourist killer) as it is ALL DOWN HILL. The stairs are very very narrow, they are terribly steep and everyone’s knees start to hurt. I manage to fall over three times on this hike. Even the experienced hikers in our group fall over. The stairs are slippery so that makes everything even harder. We descend through the cloud forest and end up in the jungle. It drizzles for the whole morning. This walk is beautiful and we get to see many different flowers. We even get to walk through a couple of tunnels today. After walking for four hours, we arrive at some ruins that have a fantastic view of Machu Picchu Mountain and the valley along side it. We sit there for a break and it is stunning. We can see our campsite below and we are told that tomorrow we get up and walk over Machu Picchu Mountain to Machu Picchu City. We then get up to walk the final 20 minutes to camp. We have to walk through the ruins, and they have a very long narrow stair case to walk down, so it takes us a while to get down that as no one wants to fall. We then arrive at our camp site at 1pm just in time for lunch. We have a our lunch then we get to have a nap. At 4pm we all get up and go to the ruins of Winay Wanay which is only 5 minutes walk away. These ruins are beautiful. They have the most amazing view of the six mountains ahead and the waterfall. We wander around here for an hour and then we head back to camp for our dinner. When we arrive to dinner the cook comes out with a cake that we he has baked us. It says “welcome to Machu Picchu”. We then put together our tips for the porters and we present them to them. The porters are not paid very well, so they really need the tips. We then go to bed as we get woken up at 4am the next day.
walked into her room and
It’s only a matter of time till Yell decides to redo these two as well
YELLOW CANDY NECKLACE
This is a 40 day journey of expressing your love to your spouse, a journey that could change your life and your marriage.
My family doesn’t know about my dating life. My son certainly doesn’t know. And if the person I date is not enough of a factor in my life to introduce to my son or my family, then it’s definitely not up for discussion with the general public.
Truth is, I felt a great deal of intense shame about my inability to step up to the plate here and not all virtuous. I felt like I had been dropped here from another planet! Why *couldn't* I tolerate school? Everyone else could. But, I just couldn't make myself do this thing, no matter how threatened, shamed, punished, berated I was; no matter how sad and puzzled my parents were. When I was fortunate enough to stumble across a subject or a teacher I liked, I did do pretty well. But, if I felt the teacher was a jerk or the subject was boring to me, I physically could not make myself go, even though it meant all kinds of annoying drama and trauma and shame and punishment. In fact, I'm probably still grounded!
1/2 teaspoon cayenne pepper
Seconds later, the Caps cashed in on a Lundqvist miscue at the other end of the ice when Chimera scored to make it 2-0. Holtby’s huge save had sparked a two-goal swing in the game.
I kept going and as the clock hit midnight, Eastern Standard Time, I had only three pages left. In that regard I failed. However, I stayed up until 1am and finished those remaining three pages. The script was done. I felt good.
*Crossed fingers my net is okay while I am writing this post* :p
88. Sublime
Add egg yolks and orange extract to reserved batter and fold together. Spoon into tube pan over plain batter. Bake until toothpick in center comes out clean, about 45 minutes. Cool and unmold.
920 square feet, king bed, entry foyer, separate living and bedroom spaces with views of Las Vegas, 42-inch LCD TV, integrated one-touch control of room features, workstation with wifi, stone shower with bench, and separate air bath whirlpool tub
The new happenings since I returned from Ohio are that I got 2 roommates! The sweetest girl you have ever met that is a Jacqueline of all trades and her adorable bundle of love, Olive, a black Golden Doodle. My, so ugly she's cute, 5 pound Chihuahua, is having fun learning how to play with a dog 100 times her size :) They are so cute. They lay on the floor facing each other and pound their paws on the floor at each other. I think they will become great friends!
I saved this some time ago but cannot find an attribution. My apologies to the author.
More often than not, when I work somewhere that I have to wear a uniform tee they seem to give me a men's large, because a 5' petite girl can pull off anything, right? No. Just stock s'more smalls por favor! Fortunately after my second shift at the MX gig, they not only gave me a small, but an extra-small. I think that one is a first!
Ron Howard G 6’5″ 200 Valparaiso
Until then, keep looking up. And, keep knowing that I am eternally grateful to all of you who care about me and my family and this project that God has laid on my heart to share with many.
For electrical outlet replacement, the entire electrical outlet is more involved than replacing just the cover, a simple operation for a Duncan electrician. The power to that outlet should be turned off first. The switches in the circuit breaker in many homes are labeled to show which room they connect to.
Also, an amazing story about my OB and insurance that I want to remember: I debated about whether or not to include this, because I know a lot of people get really passionate and opinionated about government assistance/healthcare, and I feel like I'll probably get some side-eyes and nasty anonymous comments for talking about it. But, it is a true, honest blessing, and so...here goes. In addition to having a ridiculous $5,000 deductible for insurance, which we have almost met thanks to the skin cancer procedures from January, we also discovered that even after we reach that deductible, they only pay 70% for maternity, up until we've paid $15,000 out of pocket each calendar year. Nice, right? So, it turns out that in Oregon, during pregnancy, you can apply for Oregon's version of Medicaid (OHP) to act as supplemental insurance to your private insurance in some cases, such as when you have a very high deductible. We talked about it for awhile. It wasn't a decision we made lightly. Ultimately, we applied, and I was approved, and that was and is a huge blessing to our family.
They say that you cannot teach “an old dog a new trick.” I am not sure about the dog… but I for one, who can be called an old dog, am learning new things if not tricks every day.
Do – be aware of your surroundings. Look for crazies, people with loud children who aren’t going to be sleeping much. Are the gate agents around? Does security come down by the gate and check things out. I found that the cleaning people were everywhere. I didn’t see much security, but man was my gate clean.
Director Irvin Kershner, probably the last man employed by George Lucas to ever dare to disagree with him, and who together with writer Leigh Brackett can probably be given much of the credit with making "The Empire Strikes Back" the great movie that it was, passed away on November 29 in his Los Angeles home after a long illness. He was 87.
Matthew:
One day I did seek justice and got my sweet revenge when I got the offensive sleight of no pickle spear with my deli sandwich.
Since there is no lyrical theme to describe, I will go into some detail regarding the progression of this EP because much thought was put into it. First comes a nostalgic vision from the past in the first song with the sound of an old movie projector in the opening; it's a short and deeply wistful classical composition that faintly reminds me of Philip Glass' style. What follows it is something titled “The Reoccurring Trauma/Al-Sadma Al-Mutakerera” that treads more on the eerie funeral doom side via the presence of guitar (with Thamud's Mudamer playing backing lead guitar) and double bass/blast beats in the background. The twist with this song is that it starts out eerie but gradually progresses to a more light-hearted tone that lasts through-out it's closing.
I want to make my own way, live or die, sink or swim. It’s my own fault and I deserve my fate if I am not good enough. It’s how things should be. I want to be tested. I want to be found worthy or unworthy; I care not which.
And all this achieved in a decade and a half, I’d say that’s an achievement to be proud of! I’m yet to read any of these novels but the majority of the films have been highly successful with a few major names such as Zac Efron, Miley Cyrus, Amanda Seyfried and Channing Tatum.
If you want to know if your drama will be subbed during the live stream, go back to the iOnAir home page, and click on the SUBTITLE SCHEDULE. (Of the Wednesday-Thursday dramas, it doesn’t look like Wild Romance will be live subbed … I could be wrong, so, try it anyway.)
by Caroline Starr Rose
And four friends that I really, really wanted to see but thought I couldn't because they work all the time? They either quit their jobs, were laid off, on a break from travel, or their shifts were canceled. I was able to spend time with them.
Comet Stainless Steel Item $0.75/1
2 heaping tablespoons freshly grated Parmesan cheese
ATTORNEY: Are you qualified to give a urine sample?
Can you believe that after being together for just a short while, it felt as if we had been friends for a long time?
Small chance that last one might have been Homer Simpson, I’m not sure.
So, finding out that there was such a thing as this "unschooling" was like finding the Mother lode for us! And, the more I investigated it and the more I learned about it, the more right it felt. Jimmy, a recovering Catholic school student, was totally down with the idea, too. So, now we had *this* piece of the puzzle and we were just waiting for all the other pieces to fill in around it so we could put it in place.
The Epilogue depicts He climbing to the top of a hill and then seeing the three animals – “the three beggars” – ghostly but still present. As he looks upon them, He realizes that a multitude of faceless women are climbing the hill toward him. Nature is still in pursuit. He is not going to escape.
And now, now, the stress has become so severe that their head guy, Jason Russell, lost his marbles – momentarily, we hope – and started running up and down the streets of San Diego naked, screaming things, pounding the pavement, and maybe even masturbating??!! Jesus Christ. The downside of exposure, to say the very least.
Thank you, Rick, for your interest in writing and kindness to me. And, as Rick would say, "Writers write!" So write on, and may your writing go well!
Watermelon, feta and mint
creating space for my blessings to increase.
James R. Bottino can be contacted at: “nokinis(at)thecankerdeath(dot)com”
I finished the stitchery part of my tall stitchery. This was the first one I've done in stem stich and using variegated thread. I'm quite happy with it. As this was a kit I already have the fabric for the boarders.
I can’t. I can’t even think about that.”
And of course, this decision made sense and I completely agreed with it. I had to have surgery if I wanted to give our baby the best chance at a healthy life that I could.
FULL BALANCE-SHEET.
Reagan’s policies set the trajectory for growth that would last for 20 years.
Arizona with my Paul when I’m still too young to move there might not be such a bad idea. Maybe my hair knows the future, and is just trying to help me to catch up.
.capitol punishment
“Mommy, Natalie won’t give me Crunch!” Lucy cried before cramming a thumb in her mouth.
(Annie has NEVER screamed OR yelled at me in my entire life. i actually was laughing out loud as i typed such things because they couldn't be LESS like Annie. love you Pone!)
Recently we have been talking about First QOV"s - here are 2 of Diane's first
3. Get Ready
We met on April 16, 2010. On Chat Roulette.
The image is a fab freebie from MelonHeadz and you can find it and a few more HERE. Two of my friends from work have fought and won against breast cancer in the last few years which was what started me making these encouraging cards for my stash, although it would be great if we didn't need them at all.
1) 3 medium size potatoes, cut into thin slices
And so, my Writers’ Platform-Building Campaign was born.
Even when we have “plowed wickedness” and “reaped iniquity” (10:13), God does not stop loving us. Whatever our situation today, we can turn to the Lord and find forgiveness to make a new start. His love never fails!
Black slacks: LOFT. Paisley top: unbranded, old. Navy blue jacket: Anne Klein. Bag: Les Catino. Shoes: Voir (Malaysia). Earrings: old. Necklace with turquoise pendant: gift from Bangkok. Turquoise bead nacklace: DIY project. Silver charm bracelets: old collection, during the period when I liked to collect them.
Well, I'll try to deal with it anyway, since it's been a bit since I updated. ;) Maybe the new Blogger look will inspire me to get my old blog clean&updated, too!
Jesse's older brother wasn't much better. He was always picking on Jesse and beating him up.
With the ending of my fall semester, so end the weekly publication of Shore Up the Shore. I have had a wonderful experience getting to learn so much more about my own surroundings.
Watery looking things would get a hint of green, so BG10, BG000
I love the taste and the warm glow of hard liquor.
–PECTORAL SANDPIPER (15), N of Strathmore, E side of Hwy 817, just N of Twp Rd 252, Joan and Malcolm Macdonald
((All of the sudden his bike looks tiny!!) It's slow going, he lacks faith in himself (and his Daddy!) But he'll get it.
You can’t just “wing it” on something this big.
A church that was lively and active, truly living out the Gospel call for communal transformation.
$65
To be fair, before I pat myself too furiously on the back, I had been negative on copper since late 2010 when I wrote “Copper Loses its PhD Moniker“. But the commodity totally ignored my brilliant analysis and kept going up.
No throwing tomatoes. I know, with all of the kvetching I do about people painting over nice wood, I should be shot. As a matter-of-fact, I almost shot myself. You should have heard the abuse I hurled at myself after taking a deep breath and slapping on the first bit of paint.
She really doesn't like the heat and it was very hot the day she did this. So she was trying to cool off with her hind end in the shade and lying on the cool dirt. She really tore the ground up very quickly with little breaks in between.
Location: O’Connor’s Vault, 7850 SW Capitol Hwy., Portland, Or
The film plays out in a way that shows you one thing that you’ll wonder about. Then another – if you can’t quite see that a web is being woven, you will at least suspect so. Show then reveal, show then reveal. That’s the methodology.
I often found myself putting my own care aside thinking that I just couldn't spare the time, that my kiddos needed me, that things would fall apart if I was not the one holding them together. But seriously, I was not doing them any good. At all.
Me: “That guy just took the parking spot we have been waiting for!”
If you check the "funny credits" (a trademark of AEM) above, you'll see it reads "Stan Lee, Jim Shooter & Mark Gruenwald All On The West Coast", and Larry "Bud" Melman is credited for inspiration.
@ AngelikaJahn 2012
Rather than debate questions such as “what is marketing” or the differences between product management and product marketing or even who own’s the “4 P’s” we need a better approach to establishing a context for a CMO’s success. The first step is defining the “Business Model” or the operating model for the business, business unit, product line etc.. Getting agreement among your peers about the Business Model provides “roadmap” for the enterprise and helps establish not only the business context but “how” marketing will support the success and goals of the business. It provides a “common language” for communicating goals, cross functional coordination, and defining business success across organizations. There are numerous business model frameworks you can use and its not a goal of this post to review.
Ayinger - try the Jarhundert-Bier and Altbairisch, Munich Helles and Dunkel respectively. Excellent stuff if you want light or dark Munich-style lagers.
In fact, they seemed thrilled! Which does not bode well for my future Crazy levels.
me: Stop saying DUH.
( c ) Deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life calculated to bring about its physical destruction in whole or in part;
“Absolutely. Yeah,” Abbott replied. “They’re critical.”
In the world that we live in today there are many threats, some larger than others, which could cause a global catastrophe. While I feel that among the leading world powers the greatest threat would be terrorism, one threat that the entire world faces, leading powers included, is disease; more specifically, bacterial resistance. With the ever-growing population that the world is facing, people are living closer and closer to each other. This allows certain organisms and particles to spread from person to person much more easily. With all of these hand-to-hand encounters, disease is sure to spread among countless populations. However, with our modern medical technology, we are able to treat sicknesses such as the cold or flu at home with simple medicine. Appendicitis, which back in the days would have been a death sentence, can now simply be cured and the patient can return to their normal lives in a matter of days.
72. Blue Riding Nether Ray – 200 gold + Exalted with the Sha’tari Skyguard
“We want wine,” K and I interrupt. I repeat: we are not functioning alcoholics. We’re simply pointing out what we’re in search of because we recognize the value of this gentleman’s time. I don’t want anyone getting the wrong impression. After thanking him for his help, we head toward the doors.
Vader: Oh, I don't know. I'm buying a lot already. Ah, what the heck. I'll take a Lemonade, too!
Use these links to monitor severe weather in your area:
Steve Forbert
Yes, it happens every year; it can’t be escaped. The Christmas Spirit sneaks up and grabs our Scrooge sour disposition and takes us into that breathtaking transformational world of hope, promise, kindness, and charity.
E-cigarette users are not exposed to the many toxicants, carcinogens and abundant free radicals formed when tobacco is burned. Although laboratory studies have detected trace concentrations of some contaminants, pending FDA regulation of e-cigarettes as tobacco products is likely to remedy this issue. There is limited evidence from clinical trials that e-cigarettes deliver only small doses of nicotine compared with conventional cigarettes. However, e-cigarette use emulates the cigarette handling rituals and cues of cigarette smoking, which suppresses craving and withdrawal that is not entirely attributable to nicotine delivery.
UPDATE: I knew I saw a purple version at the Brooks stand in Sept! Here’s how the Pure Connects look in purple – fabulous! Here’s hoping that they are released soon here in Australia.
My praying is a gift, my faith is a gift. I keep myself by being kept. I keep myself by doing doing keeping things. And that takes effort by faith in the spirit.
So, to conclude: domestic, lightly mystical (featuring the Sitars of Transcendentalism), and endlessly interpretable, this is a rare glimpse into middle class workaday urban India, when most other stuff tends to be Orientalist poverty porn or Karan Joharified NRI luxury fests.
I just don't know that threatening a lawsuit was the best way to go about it. The negativity this has stirred up, along with the confusion of how to use her fabrics, isn't the best for business.
Will Mr Doncaster do so, or has his media blitz ceased for now, at least until next Monday?
Ok Ladies, I think I went too far on this card… I mean.. too much on the colors.. but as the cardstock is colorful I wanted to do something different on the image….
Be very careful, then, how you live—not as unwise but as wise, making the most of every opportunity, because the days are evil. Ephesians 5:15-16 (NIV)
The Melody that can’t be washed away by the noise of the complicated city
And this was after a *good* breakfast of a bowl of cereal with light milk, and a 6 inch sub from Subway for lunch. Yeah, could have been healthier, but in the food court I was in, trust me. I took the healthy option.
This song is just for you
The insert only extends to about 2/3 the width of the bag. That extra space in the bag (below – it’s shown on the right side) – is where I stuffed my water bottles. I had originally thought that I wanted water bottle holders or pockets on the outside of my bag – but – once in the field – it worked to be an advantage to have room in the bag for the bottles.
The Lawyer used by Mr. Roopnarine to file these alleged fake Police matters on Carnival Thursday morning, was also hurriedly dismissed by him first thing Ash Wednesday morning.
OK, now onto the bakery section where everything smells so good, I’m tempted to fill my cart with cookies and call it a day. Being on a perpetual diet, I try to hurry past the assortment of pies, cakes, breads, and pastries that have my children drooling. At this point the chorus of “Can we gets” begins.
“Despite the rhetoric of top BN leaders, there has never been a BN shadow cabinet in Kedah, Penang, Selangor, and Kelantan,” he said.
The great sadness of being part of the broad New York coalition against British intransigence and entrenched Ulster unionism was that when the peace process began former comrades turned against each other. It was inevitable, I suppose, for as one wise old Republican stated, “it’s a lot easier be against something than for it.”
Our time together ended as Mr Fawkes got a phone call that calls him away on urgent business, but that I suspected was prearranged to ensure he could make a polite exit.
With a single, disastrous 5-to-4 ruling, the Supreme Court has thrust politics back to the robber-baron era of the 19th century. Disingenuously waving the flag of the First Amendment, the court’s conservative majority has paved the way for corporations to use their vast treasuries to overwhelm elections and intimidate elected officials into doing their bidding.
The one advantage of having these malodorous obnoxities stay in one place for the time being is that the virus which they represent cannot spread. What is more, it will be actually possible to sow a virus amongst them themselves. Not an ideological one. A proper one. I am not wanting to imagine for one moment what the sanitary conditions must be like on Wall Street, for instance, but it will only be a matter of time before the first spores of anthrax ripple through the throng; there must still be some of them left over from the biological research programs carried out by those involved in Farm Warfare (the CIA training facility, not the band from Liverpool). I have already been told that there is a cockroach cluster assembling in Battery Park which has been trained to sneak into protestors' sleeping bags and deposit there a cough and cholera strain (possibly I misheard and it is a "cuff and collar" strain, equally deadly to these workshy recalcitrants. Or perhaps I am confusing it with the Tie Flu.
inside of you, inside the grave,
According to the Brooklyn Eagle, the work includes exterior masonry, roof and parapet replacement, flood elimination, and may also require asbestos abatement.
* "£700 demand letters: no Golden Egg for Golden Eye", here. The IPKat admires a masterly summary by Mr Justice Arnold of the law relating to how not to chase allegedly copyright-infringing file-sharers.
"But what then?" asked the Mexican.
9. Whitney
The Good News: The vet called my Mom back today with my fructosamine level. The high end of “normal” is 500. I came back 509. So. Damned. Close. Because the level was still high, the vet suggested that we increase my insulin to 5 units 2X a day. This means that I’m now taking more insulin that my Aunt Trudy, who is way bigger than me! But we will do another test and I’m expecting that between the insulin and the changes Mom and the vet discussed, that we might even be able to get me off insulin completely! That would rock on so many different levels.
We cannot say that ‘evolution’ truly values in the ways that organisms value, however. An evolutionary population is known in network ethics as a plex, a collective entity which is quasi-living, for it resembles living organisms in many ways, but can do so only when supported by living organisms. An evolutionary population is a plex, just as a language is a plex. There are many types of plexes, for example, memeplexes, semeplexes, etc.
"I'm not buying a new big house."
In bed in the morning: how I long to feel FREE. Not dreaming any longer all these stories of guilt and having to atone for sins. Being free of all the pain and stiffness and blocks in the head/neck-area.
the heart’s place in his chest
11. Stupid Me
Warner Bros. profited from Beast in another way as well. Barely a year (in fact, 371 days) later, the studio released its own homemade variation: Them! Warners knew a good thing when they had it, and they stuck close to the formula. Once again, nuclear testing unleashed a horrible freak of nature (this time, giant mutant ants), a major city came under attack (Los Angeles), and a beloved old character actor was along to play the movie's senior scientist (Edmund Gwenn, in a role very much like Cecil Kellaway's in The Beast). Other animals, insects, arachnids, even humans, would stumble into the atomic oven and thunder out their warnings of Things Man Was Not Meant to Meddle In, and plenty of them are on view in this blogathon. The Beast from 20,000 Fathoms led the way, and proved there was gold in them thar radioactive hills.
Here is the thing.
It might take a little more work, but sex with your long-term, committed SO (significant other) can be so much more rewarding, even if it’s not as hot as a new love.
The editorial does not make comforting reading, for those who think "democracy" is "sweeping the Arab world".
While much of the Tunisian and Western press has focused on the debate between Ennahda and the secular opposition, Tunisia’s ruling party has also faced criticism both from within its own party and from more conservative Salafi groups. Ennahda’s approach to instilling Islamic values in society contrasts sharply with that of Salafi trends: while the party believes that society should gradually, and through democratic institutions, adopt the principles it once lost under colonialism and secular dictatorships, many Salafis assert that democracy infringes on God’s sovereignty by establishing humans as legislators. This intra-Islamist debate may prove to be the true battleground in the ongoing transition.
Patricia McCormick spent hundreds of hours interviewing Pond. She traveled to Cambodia with the now-45-year-old to retrace his every step during the three years, eight months and 20 days that the Khmer Rouge held power. She retraced his escape through a Thai refugee camp and interviewed members of his adoptive American family.
In the meantime, life hasn't has slowed down as much as I hoped it would at this point... it's just still rolling right along! Whew! But I'm slowly getting my feet under me. :o)
The boudin was well seasoned with an abundance of cayenne pepper, and the eggroll wrapper solved some of the physical problems of eating boudin on the run. Pairing it with a pale ale was a near perfect match, though next time I may try a Pilsner Urquell to help calm the heat of all that seasoning.
The water sluices of skin smooth like satin
Here's another view from the front, looking towards the back.
journal entry: isn’t it funny how we worry about tomorrow? the truth is that we always have what we need today. you have everything you need for today.
* I’ll wager George Hook no more believes everyone in Limerick is a knife-wielding maniac because he jokes about it than I do because I laugh.
John 6:13 And so they gathered them up, and filled twelve baskets with fragments from the five barley loaves, which were left over by those who had eaten.
Wardrobe switchout, winter to summer. This is part one, dresses and skirts. More pants and tops to come later. Argh. My summer wardrobe is substantially larger than my winter one, as I am a creature of warmth.
“Oh…”
By Cassandra Vinograd – Associated Press
The problem is, I don’t care much about the problems in their lives anymore. Gaby and Carlos continue the same fight over his new job and her selfishness. Lynette continues to make bad decisions and wonder why she can’t get Tom back. And Bree’s trial moves forward at a snail’s pace.
But my favorite change so far HAS to be the dining room! What a transformation!
The UFSC-PS Chapter and Tabor 100 Financial Fitness team continues to encourage students to learn the basic money management skills; thus ushering underserved communities into mainstream banking. “Getting students thinking and acting earlier in this process is considered essential for keeping the youth on target for future success,” states Kevin Washington, Education Committee Chair for Tabor 100. If you are interested in scheduling a youth financial literacy program in your community, please contact UFSC-PS Chapter BOOF Program Lead Lizzie L. Evans at founder@ufscps.org . eEnterprises International will host the next BOOF certification webinar training. Additional information about the event is available on the Financial Fitness Program page at www.ufscps.org.
I guess i wish i could finally see the day when dreams and reality collide for good.
We had a great time as well, although I wish we had one more day for down time and maybe some alone time for E and I.
Ms. Harrell used an interesting approach with the dual POV in the story, telling Psyche’s point of view in the intimate first person account, allowing us to really get into her head and heart and feel as though we are walking in her shoes, while telling Eros’s story in the more limited third person. While the transition between the two did jar me a little in the beginning, I found myself eagerly going back and forth, enjoying the unique nuances of the different modes of narration. For Eros in particular—the god of love who falls desperately for Psyche--the more distant narrative allowed him to retain a bit more of his masculine, swoony, god-like qualities, without coming across like a completely whipped mama’s boy.
Shirl - Vintage Sea Muse
twisting in sumptuous hands
Crossing the Mississippi River
445230 Fruit & vegetable markets
Fashion. in colour.
Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan planned this terrorist attack and executed it in cold blood. The resulting massacre was the first tragedy. The second was that he wasn't killed on the spot.
Today, when strange objects drop out of the sky some people get really exited and use the occasion as evidence of alien existence. The fact of the matter is that “earthly” space junk falls out of the sky all the time.
And as I try to think of story ideas, there are the nattering ghosts of doubt that keep whispering in my ear, “That’s a cliche idea, everybody’s done it already.” “Nobody’s cared about that sort of science fiction story since you were four years old.” “That twist doesn’t add anything to the setup.” “What will you ever do for an ending?”
Although the rights of women are different to those of men, they do have the right to choose whom they marry, to divorce, to study, to own property, to conduct business and to take part in politics.
But like my Dad said earlier today...winter's not over yet -LOL
Mine would be the Purple Tentacle from Day Of The Tentacle. I believe he might be one of the only few villain who succesfuly achieved global domination.
Last year, Dylan went on ONE "big kid" ride - the Hot Air Balloons. So, naturally, we went on those first this time. But, then, he wanted to go on more "big kid" rides... and more... and more... One sad part was when he was told, after waiting in a long line, that he wasn't big enough to ride the bumper cars. Two little tears escaped one eye, before he regained his composure and put on a brave face. Jim and I don't do well on rides that spin. If the whole ride spins, that is usually okay, but if each individual car spins, that is usually NOT. Dylan really wanted to go on the Tilt-A-Whirl, so my mom went on it with him! That lady is amazing, I tell you!
The Museu de Futebol is located inside the Paulo Machado de Carvalho stadium in Praça Charles Miller. The museum has some great displays in very interesting exhibit space that includes a stop underneath the actual stadium. In additional to historical facts, video interviews, old-time radio casts and, of course, a variety of balls, equipment and uniforms used over the past century, the museum has an amazing collection of photography that documents both the passing of time in Brazil as well as games. You get a chance to try and kick a goal at an electronic goalie, with a photo included, and can play a virtual soccer game.
What about the dreams? Tell them about the dreams.
Our next island is Malenge which has two hotels. The first hotel is a bit strange. They have a tiny beach and a large patch of grass. There is also an old Bajo (Sea Gypsy) cemetery on the property. There does not seem to be good snorkeling here and we actually do not try. It is near two Bajo villages, and we can easily imagine that all of their waste gets plopped into the water while all of the fish get plucked out of the water. The Bajo fish in the water with goggles and a handmade spear gun. So we spend the day visiting the Sea Gypsy village and losing trails in the jungle. We spend our first evening reading in hammocks, watching the Bajo play volleyball in the hotel grass and then leaving the hotel before dinner because Mika catches a peeping tom Sea Gypsy while in the mandi. The owner is irate (at having a peeping tom or losing a customer?) and sends all the volleyball playing Sea Gypsies back to their village. Word on the street is that this is not a one-time occurrence. Hopefully the owner will finally take care of the peep holes.
Avengers week continues! Here’s another member of the Avenger’s holy trinity: Iron Man. When it comes to the Avengers Captain America, Thor and Iron Man are the 3 big dogs. They’re not always all on the team at the same time but when they are that is when you know you have the real deal. Sometimes months pass where you have a team of say Iron man, Dr. Druid, Yellowjacket, Jacosta, Rage and Jack-of-Hearts and you’re just thinking why the hell am I reading about one cool character surrounded by this gang of losers? Not to say those losers can’t make for interesting characters but The Avengers book in the past has strayed a little too far from its roots as Marvel’s premiere super team a little too often. Once you’ve got the trinity together then you can pad the team with whatever other wankers you want and it’ll still make for a good read. A few years ago writer Brian Michael Bendis took a hard look at the Avengers and realized the team was comprised mostly of B-list characters who couldn’t support a title of their own so what place did they have on the Avengers. He noted that DC Comics has their Justice League which is comprised of all of their biggest and best known heroes like Superman, Batman, Wonder Woman, Green Lantern, Flash, Aquaman etc. so why shouldn’t the Avengers be Marvel’s equivalent to that? He destroyed the team in a storyline called Avengers disassembled where many of the B-listers were killed including Hawkeye, Vision, Antman and Jack-of-Hearts (don’t worry, most of them are better now) Bendis then rebuilt the team from the ground up in a newly launched title called The New Avengers. This team included Capt and Iron Man and I’m sure would have included Thor had he been alive at the time. In an unorthodox move Bendis also added a couple of Marvel’s other signature characters who seemed to have no place on the Avengers, Wolverine and Spider-Man. This roster change resulted in the Avenger’s becoming Marvel’s top selling book for the first time in decades. This move worked in getting me to read the Avengers book on a regular basis which I had never done before. Bendis has remained on the book ever since and has expanded the line. I now buy a half dozen Avengers books every month, Avengers, New Avengers, Secret Avengers, Avengers Academy and Avengers Assemble. Not to mention solo books for Cap, Iron man, Hulk, Spider-Man and a slew of other Avengers related books.
Kayleigh and Peanut are THE best pets (i hate that word, so unfamily like to me *ick*) ever!!! - Kayleigh is always sparkling, waiting for me to get home to play and exchange kisses (she's a teacup maltese) ~ Peanut can't wait to play with me and his zebra (he's an eastern gray squirrel) ... they both bring me such simple joy .. makes me realize what it's ALL about .. pure happiness and simplicity! ~ pure souls!
-How can you be stupid enough to believe that rumor? Have you never fact checked anything in your life?
My girl's character has an important arc, but is her arc as important as the older boy's?
The people looking outside of their windows probably saw other people witnessing the murder, and so simply concluded that someone else would call the police. Also, the uncertainty of the situation, the shock, would cause some people to simply pause and hope that someone else would do something so they would not have to.
I was tempted to add a dash or even a swathe of pink but pink has connotations which say 'I am a girly girl who has never chopped wood'. Which I haven't, but you know what I mean. However I disagree with this stereotyping. The right shade of pink is very agreeable if you disconnect it from its associations.
Correct me if Im wrong but!
The decision to make Steven a wordless character was quite risky, as it put the dialogue onus solely on the underdeveloped shoulders of a child actor. Luckily, Eva Kovacs is a spirited delight as the ever curious Kim, a girl whose thirst for knowledge troubles her parents (they think she should focus less on the persistence of vision, and more on her homework). Besides, Steven's voice can be heard loud and clear in the segments I alluded to earlier; in that, he speaks through his ambitious characters.
In the meantime, keeping my eyes open. Customer service is wearing my ass out. I'd like to find something with a Saturday or two off, every now and then. Had to change my Saturday off for this weekend, my first in 5 weeks. Was wanting to wander to a small Con this weekend, and maybe do a little early birthday celebration. Chalking yet another one up to "wasn't meant to be."
Music was provided by the Bear Heart and Little Thunder Singers throughout the ceremony, and the several hundred assembled members of the Ho-Chunk Nation had the chance to hear many speakers, including immediate past President Wilfred Cleveland, the first Ho-Chunk President to serve a full term under the current tribal constitution.
11’08 I Wanna Know
This legislation was introduced by Representative John Conyers (D-MI) on March 11, 2011 and referred to a subcommittee on health on March 11.
As you do, all of the gifts and abilities of your multidimensional self come on board and are available to the body in this time frame of now. More and more individuals are experiencing what you call paranormal skills and capabilities. We have often invited you to recognize and allow these gifts and powers to come forth.
It's better than it's digital alternatives.
This is what he wrote
OK enough for the morning, so have a nice day folks.
“There will be arts events taking place in unusual places all over the U.K. that will showcase the best in international culture when the eyes of the world are on us this summer,” said festival director Ruth Mackenzie.
We have 2 new patterns at the printer. They will be sent out to the distributors later this week. The first one pictured, Mother's Garden was done in honor of Barb's mother, Leona Adams. Her initials are under the tree branch. The other initials are her children, grandchildren and great grandchildren. Love this one as a mother's day gift!
I repeated a block design that coordinated with the piecing, and a simple sashing design. We were both happy with how it turned out.
Raising Canes. Drugs aside, House has done great things for another byway of the economy--the market for walking sticks and canes. Begin your makeover at the cane and stick emporium, fashionable canes and walking sticks, which offers ten variations of walking sticks that have appeared on the show, including the Flame, Alpaca Feather, Derby, Tourist, and, of course, the Skull Handle.
Where was the Wilder? The air danced, the grass glittered, but there were no footsteps - the ground still glowed faintly where the women had set their feet - and none of the strain lines that would betray a Wilder concealing itself. For a second a ripple across the water and the grass by the path formed the shape of a giant noose around the women, but that was just Second-Realm logic pushing at him.
So I wandered around it for ages, eventually found the door switch, then it was like a spaceship inside. Which buttons to press first! I like pressing buttons…
what? WHAT? In its current form? Does it shapeshift? No NO NO! You query only for FINISHED novels. Never ever use that phrase in a query letter.
Essentially, it's a day of good conferencing for £250 plus VAT, for which you can also pick up accreditation. Click here for details.
The stranger, visibly surprised by the little girl's intelligence, thinks about it and says, 'Hmmm, I
As Micah 6:8 says: “He has told you, O mortal, what is good; and what does the LORD require of you but to do justice, and to love kindness, and to walk humbly with your God?”
I'm in need of some Sympathy cards for on the card rack so I went in the direction of something floral and I really like it!
Today I’d like to introduce you guys to a product that I am in love with that you may not have heard about, or even if you have, you may not know what it does. It’s called the Kari Komrad HUD and is the latest and greatest creation from Menno Ophelia.
One of the outgrowths of contentment is a peaceful heart. Let us not be like the children of Israel who got tired of their daily miracle: “Manna again? Man, I want to go back to Egypt and get some more garlic, leeks and onions.” My friend, slavery is a pretty big price to pay for a change in diet.
Realize that confession is the new innocence. You can never truly be innocent until you confess your sins; guilt will haunt you until do. But the Bible promises that when you confess your sins to God, He is faithful to forgive you and cleanse you from all unrighteousness, and when you confess your sins to other people and pray for one another, you can experience healing. The way to innocence is by admitting your guilt and agreeing with God that you’ve sinned so you can embrace the grace He offers you to make a fresh start.
Pry myself away from the oven.
Winning a new referendum is going to be an uphill struggle The turnout last June was 53%, considerably higher than in Nice Two, with many more voting No and fewer voting Yes. This has removed the 2001 argument that a low turnout in some way justified a re-run, given the issues and the feeling that the electorate took its eye off the ball. Next time also there will be no moral pressure (a vote for enlargement) and no tangible economic benefit from voting Yes. Ireland’s recent prosperity and the entry of a slew of poorer countries has ensured there will be no more European monies flowing into Ireland.
distinctive characters (by Melina Hammer) - a monochromatic setting with a plain two colored background. This setting is focussing strongly on the wonderful structures and textures of the mushroom.
Also speaking at the event was deputy vice-chancellor Professor Crain Soudien, who said UCT should be especially outraged, because the tragedy touches on questions which are at the heart of the university.
For the longest time, there have been rumours of the PS4 and 720 having anti-piracy systems in them. Now, this may or may not be true, but I’d err on the side of “no”, as anyone who takes the time to think would.
Nomination of 15 Blogs/Bloggers:
PCW Rankings
Diane von Furstenburg on Chinese people:
Upon a sprinkled spread.
Nashville, Ga.
It’s my job to equip them for either boredom or war,
All the guests wore black hooded capes, Harry Potter-esque glasses, and carried wizard wands. We wanted to create the uniform for Wiz Tech, the Wizard Academy seen in the show.
Hamish also meets up with other friends and relatives during the series such as his grandad Rory (above)who lives in Glamis castle, the international clan members - McHaggises from all over the world who come to visit for the Clan Gathering.
And the aluminum bottle can reused indefinitely, saving the earth from hundreds of plastic water bottles over time.
My contribution will be online at 2.30pm this afternoon. (I'll add a link when it's posted) Fiona Dunbar and I decided to do something jointly about our new books - Fiona's is called Divine Freaks and it's the first in her new Kitty Slade series about a girl who can see ghosts and who solves mysteries, sometimes with the help of the ghosts and sometimes despite them. I love Kitty, she's feisty, down-to-earth and brave - and I can't wait to read the rest in the series.
I LOVE that you come as an Indian Master
And safeguard our nation through life.
I wish a portion of the rocket develops a life of its own, boomerangs, and slams right into kim jong-un’s fat face!
A few posts ago I mentioned cleaning out my closets for a charity clothing swap.
I even began to blog about things I’m cooking at home to try and bring myself to want to cook more. While I’m more able to maintain a level head when I’m hungry and I’m enjoying the learning of cooking (slow as it may be), I’m still having problems with finding things I want to eat. Even now, I know I need to find recipes for next week, and currently I have no idea what I will be cooking. Nothing sounds good.
ASH did not make a grant application to the department’s Third Sector Investment Programme: Innovation, Excellence and Service Development Fund for 2011-12. The department currently has no other plans to provide ASH with funding in the next financial year.
leather straps that wrap and tug us blind;
Normally around here, end of winter brings abundant rain, or even more. It usually takes four weeks to get to mowing, gardening, you know all that good stuff.
Backdated from 2/13:
We saw a different doctor this time and everything he said coincides with what your regular pediatrician has said. Thankfully though, this doctor gave us a referral to a pediatric dermatologist who you will be seeing at the end of the month. I'm hopeful that we will find something that will help you more than what your doctors have currently been able to do for you.
The Colossus of Rhodes DID NOT STRADDLE THE HARBOUR.
I was mighty and rich,
One thing when you pack summer clothes. If you are planning to visit popular religious destinations, I recommend that you bring along clothes that cover really well. Because you will not be allowed to visit pagodas if you are wearing short skirts, shorts, singlets; anything that shows a lot of skin. Burmese people take the dress code seriously when you go to pagodas. To be frank, there are some Burmese people who don’t follow the dress code. But we love it when tourists follow the code and cover up well.
Emily and I had the great honor of "experiencing" the intricate, behind-the-scenes workings of caring for multiples--quadruplets to be exact, in addition to a new born baby!
I like the nose on this which has malt with dessert wine notes. The palate is chocolate covered cherries, yielding to malt, wait, actually...it's chocolate malt balls. Mouthfeel is a bit thin and the finish is maraschino cherries. This one is definitely on the sweet side.
We somehow have the idea that fear is irrational and shouldn't be heeded. Everything's fine, we lie when common sense screams DANGER! (This applies to comfortable settings, as well, such as during church services.) We should feel uncomfortable when a man gets into our personal space. Don't let him in! We should feel suspicious and distrustful when some suave guy starts asking personal questions and gives us that dashing, disarming smile. We should feel fear! God gave us the feelings of discomfort, suspicion, distrust, and fear for a reason. Do you think Joseph might have felt those feelings just before he RAN from Potiphar's wicked wife? Don't turn those feelings off; listen and obey!
She was flushed with delight when we had finished our little jaunt, all traces of her earlier tears having vanished entirely. I then escorted her to the bus stop. On our way there she asked me an unusual question:
Director: Donald Hartman, Rudolph Mate
A place to breathe.
Beet Pulp - 1 tbsp
When set to SQL Server 2000, the SQL Server 2000 type system is used. The following conversions are performed when connecting to a SQL Server 2005 instance:
Out of desperation we cry out to the Lord. The Lord hears our prayer and begins to work things out. We see that light at the end of the tunnel and seeing the way out we say, “Thank you Lord, we can do it from here on.” We trust Him up to a point and then we put our trust in our own weakness. How often we grieve the Holy Spirit by going the way of the flesh.
Gastao is a lovely dog! He is gentle with people but quite shy when he does not know them. He is submissive and calm so he should fit well into a new family but a new family should grant him an adaptation period and be patient with him, after all he hardly even been outside of the shelter since the age of a small puppy. He is social with other dogs, males and females.
Alan Summers is a Japan Times award-winning writer for haiku and renku.
If you know the hotel is booking up fast don’t be afraid to email or call specific guests to inform them that if they don’t make their reservation soon they may not have a room to book at all.
24. Every Time - The Scrubs
Dear Zori! On the occasion of your birthday, I send you all my best and good wishes. I want you to stay healthy so that one day we will see each other again and then our longing for each other will be at an end. Our darling little daughter should remain the symbol of our deep love.
She backed off. Whew! Crisis averted.. NO! Suddenly this tiny cat who can't jump but must climb up on couches and chairs, leaped up and started whapping the crap out of a cowering giant baby!
My EIGHT tips for a successful shopping trip to Forever 21:
Now where do I bury the dreams built on castles in the air?
Who admits the delusive light through the bouncing wall,
Chapter two of The Big Short – which was excerpted in Vanity Fair, and works almost as well as a standalone article – illustrates this beautifully. It begins by introducing you to Michael Burry, a 32-year-old hedge fund manager. Burry, you discover, wanted to understand the sub-prime mortgage bond market. And Lewis explains pithily what he found:
history that
The poem was written in Gt. Britain during the winter of 1873-74, the first verse in Edinburgh, the remaining two, which, however, Jochumsson himself never estimated highly in London. At that time only a decde had passed since he had attracted nationwide notice by his poetry, and yet another ten years went by before a separate volume of poems by him was to appear.
AND 1ST PLACE GOES TO... The Dummy (der!). I never wanted you. I can't wait to get rid of you. I can't do without you!
the store a Happy Anniversary!!
So, if it wasn't for some great people, good beer (though it has been a while), delicious sausages, amazing breads and an endless variety of tasty mustards, it would have been a very long and arduous journey thus far.
The border in the centre of the card - spellbinders edgeabilities classic triple scallop
4th Amendement
Friday night, there was a fight in the parking lot at working during my dinner break. I am not sure of all the details of the reasons of the fight but the one guy involved seems to the kind of guy that it always looking for a fight. He was working as a temp but got let go because he threaten another person at work. Now his wife works at the warehouse still and that is why he was there. Now there is a time to fight but it should be the last resort when other options have not worked.
NOPE....NONE...Total bummer
--“CNN Live,” 3 May 2006
Tomorrow I get to get and get me a new color in my hair and I think it’s something that is needed. I just need to try something new. And I’m thinking that this is a start to my fresh start. I really started not liking the person that I was becoming and now I see that there is more to life then dealing with BS. And the fact that I have been dealing with a lot, I don’t want to deal with it anymore. It is no longer my concern anymore. If someone decides that they don’t want to be with me any more, then oh well. That is his lost. I know that I’m a good woman, I know what I bring to a relationship, and I know my worth. Fuck settling for less, I’m NEVER settling again. I’m not about to rush into another relationship. I’m about to focus on getting this weight off, getting me a job, getting my car, and continue to better myself. For the last 2 1/2 years I’ve been managing without a steady job, still been able to manage my priorities. I haven’t had a car since my engine blew out, but damn it when it’s the right time for me to get something. I will something that is meant for me and then I will have the right job. Its time for me to change scenery and I see it happening sooner then later. But enough of the victim talk (the talk that someone told me I portray).
Above are all the combinations possible with the red skirt. Trust me. You'll see a couple of these during the remix. They all work with the exception of the yellow polka dot shirt/red skirt combo. But who knows? Throw on a navy blazer and a wide belt and it might work too!
Baring also brought a depth of culture that few of his generation could equal. Although still only 34 years old, he had traveled widely throughout Europe as a diplomat, journalist, and man of leisure. He knew Latin, Greek, French, German, Italian, Russian, and Danish, and he was widely read in the literature of all these languages. He was the quintessential European. Belloc's words in An Open Letter on the Decay of Faith, published in 1906, would have struck Baring with a particular resonance and poignancy as he made his final approach to the Church:
It seems to me there should be some consistency in how we define and then in how we use these terms. Otherwise we would simply be shifting our definitions for our own theological needs. Not that I’m accusing you of this, you may have some valid reasons, but I would like to know how it is Daniel 2 and 7 refers to “heaven-kingdom” and why Matthew 25:34 refers to “earth-kingdom.”
But, if I am stuck in a non-Indian’s kitchen with no access to Indian spices and am requested to cook something Indian, I would proudly make this dish because given the circumstance this is as close as I can get to the real thing.
It is not their job. They didn’t ask for it. And when it is done through artificial means it goes beyond irresponsible to reprehensible.
While Paramount was the studio for great comedies and home to some of the greatest directors of all time, for a time it also released animated cartoons that rivalled and sometimes even surpassed those of Warner Brothers and Disney. It was in 1928 that Fleischer Studios, Inc., founded in 1921 by brothers Max and Dave Fleischer, signed a production and distribution deal with Paramount. While the Fleischer Brothers were all ready well established and respected animators in the Twenties, it was arguably during their years with Paramount that they released their best work. It was at Paramount that they introduced their best known creation, Betty Boop. Betty would be an incredible success from her introduction until the Production Code would force the Fleischers to tone down the raciness of her cartoons in 1934. Even thereafter she remained a popular character and continued to appear in animated shorts until 1939.
I never got the cane again..
* Llana is pissed. Chains Ben to the ground and makes him dig his own grave.
Your mama don't dance and your daddy don't
efficient irrigation methods, new plant varieties, drought resistance,
BUY SPIKE'S BOOKS FOR YOUR LOVED ONES THIS HOLIDAY SEASON! BECAUSE NOTHING SAYS SEASON'S GREETINGS! LIKE A COPY OF PISSED OFF UNDER THE FESTIVUS POLE!
The basement is used for storage and houses the old furnace room that was used to heat the building before central heat and air was installed. No blueprints remain, but it is thought that the builder, a supposed descendant from one of the Demi-Gods, had incorporated hidden rooms and passageways.
When I was on the phone with the last lady, I made mention of the fact that I don't qualify for food stamps or anything like that because my unemployment is too high. Her response, "Well, your circumstances have changed. I'm sure they'll help you now".
~ Bartending is really peopletending.
Whimsy Stamps (Kenny K) - Biker Girl
Sometimes killing an industry is an unforeseen side effect. The woodworking tool industry is in crisis right now. A few months ago, a lawsuit was won against Ryobi tools' parent company, for producing a "defective" table saw. The plaintiff was awarded $1.5 million when he sued for $250,000. The defect? It did not include an expensive safety option that was invented around year 2000; (the modern tilt-arbor table saw was invented in 1939; the basic idea goes back to 1813). In 2000, an inventor produced a technology called a Saw Stop that senses when flesh touches the blade and stops the blade in milliseconds. In the process of stopping the saw as fast as it does, it destroys the saw blade, and possibly other parts of the saw. The user still gets cut, but typically will require stitches instead of having a body part cut off. He shopped this invention to the major tool makers and none of them agreed to license his invention. Their major concern was that the idea was untested; they had no idea how durable it would be (contractors' tools live a rough life); they had no idea if it could be added to existing products (were they rugged enough to survive the abrupt energy dump that destroys the blade?), or how to roll it out across their product lines. The inventor started his own company, and sells table saws with this feature.
“You can't want that.”
“The humble sage, by virtue of true knowledge, sees with equal vision a learned and gentle brāhmaṇa, a cow, an elephant, a dog and a dog-eater (outcaste).” (Bg. 5.18)
WHAT I WILL NOT MISS ABOUT BEING PREGNANT
evening rehab exercises
He opens his eyes, and it is well past dusk now. He can see it. It’s perfect for him, though. He hadn’t wanted to wake up until now anyway. It would be dangerous to practice his art in the day, when others might see it. Not for his protection, of course, but for theirs.
I ordered the part which costs like $300 since I'm a thousand miles past warranty that stupid piece of shit. It's a goddamn 2010 car it should run better than my 1996 jeep which it doesn't...
Ringo disappeared three months ago, leaving her as the single pet and getting more attention if she wanted it. That will change at some point when I find a new dog - it's been just over a year since Cassie has passed.
Patriot Surplus was founded by a former United State Marine and the company sells military clothing and a wide variety of other military gear.
Gregory: Rush Limbaugh called a student
First let stress that it is a well written book, I liked the style, I felt like I was really there and got a good picture of the setting and lifestyle.
So happy belated birthday JR, and happy early birthday to meeeeee!
Finally…Penang police are looking for these “witnesses” to assist in their investigation into the Feb 26 (Sunday) chaos which aborted the anti-Lynas rally at the Speakers Square.
one afternoon miss maggie was wanting to go over and play with her big sisters in their room...which is a room all three girls share, and magpie thinks she is big stuff to play with her big sisters, but they had other plans ;)
Now that we got my ranting and raving out of the way, lets discuss this coupon business, or as some like to call it '"couponing". My friend told me about her coupon experiences in January. She told me she saved over 50% (at least) on her groceries a month. I didn't believe it. I mean really though, using a coupon and getting things for free because of that coupon?! I needed an explination on a few things.
Cats on the bartop, disco light flickering, chewed up flip flops on the floor.....
6:30 - Get myself and Sir ready
Graphic design students need to design a backstage pass for a concert for your band. You may decide the dimensions of the pass. Remember that most backstage passes are either clipped on your clothes or hung around the neck so it isn’t real large but it does need to be large enough to read easily. The pass needs to have the band logo as well as the concert date and other information that would allow the user to obtain backstage privileges.
to be in April.
At Shaklee, doing business and doing good are not mutually exclusive. We've been demonstrating that for 50 years.
This is the barrier we must overcome to succeed. If we could achieve that we might be granted one last grasp at our salvation. For it is in breaching the shark infested moat of lies that we find both our answer and also our greatest dilemma.
Yesterday I colored up three turtle images (in the spirit of my mud team, the "Fast and Dirty Turtles".....but I promise no more mud talk....back to cards) and made the first one into a card using Deconstructed Sketch #50 and my all-time favorite OCL set, "Kona."
she said mybe she ate nuts,keropok kacang actually.
as the mystic augurs wait for god’s sign to reveal itself.
They'll be haunting other stages before we know it......
Loosely Laced
Here's another picture of the top and bottom of the cheese box. You can see how the cut-away pieces make a reversed design on the other half.
Remind us of the days when we were priests and shamans because people knew we were a gift.
The babies are due to be delivered by caesarean section on May 20 when she reaches the seventh month of pregnancy.
In a joint statement issued ahead of the World Press Freedom Day which falls on May 3, the South Asian Free Media Association (SAFMA) and the South Asia Media Commission (SAMC) have urged governments in South Asia to safeguard the freedom of expression against repressive provisions, measures or groups.
Read Mark 14:12-26
After conducting the interviews, I found out some interesting results. From the 3 males and 1 female I interviewed, I discovered that females are more likely to change their dress sense in order to fit in rather than males. I did expect this response as I do know people from school who have changed since leaving for university. I personally feel that people change because it is a new start for them and they are moving into a new environment; a course where other students have similar interests as them. I also found that men are more likely to buy brands of clothes because they seem to think that expensive clothes will attract the opposite sex.
2-3 cups of water
And the wholehearted
I said I was going to get a little ladybug.....knowing in my mind I had found these pictures on Pinterest and I had a project in mind.
I think i've spent the majority of this summer dreading the fall. I took a big break from blogging and we had a pretty nice summer vacation. We took a trip, got lots of visits from friends, did some hiking, rediscovered the love of golf, and discovered tennis. But underneath all that fun there was always the dread.........i get it every.single.year.
where the Bacchic women of Sicily
I've also been trying and trying to get pictures of the two of them looking at me. For the life of me...it just.will.not.work. Evan is so full of energy he won't sit still for more than two seconds. The minute I get him to look at me Arabella is staring off into space. It can be so stinking frustrated. I took over 81 pictures tonight and above is all that I got out of it. I guess even getting one capture is a success with those two. Gotta love kids!
I give a damn.
A minute later I was out the door, my backpack full of my school stuff and a change of clothes. I walked quickly, crying hysterically, unable to catch my breath.
I have felt much more comfortable in the giving help side of that relationship than in the receiving part. Through this journey, I have certainly been forced into a place where many times I cannot walk on my own two feet, and have had the blessing of leaning on others. As the weeks and months have passed, I've felt more wobbly, but not really known how to reach out. I know that it sounds silly as so many of you have offered to help, sometimes specifically, sometimes generally, but the offer has been made hundreds of times since the beginning of this journey. Often as people have said, "Would you like me to..." my response has been, "No thank you, I've got it." As I wrote previously, it's easy to feel alone when not accepting help of others. Much of my feeling of aloneness has felt paralyzing, where I've wanted help, but hadn't known how people could help or even simply saying, "yes," when help is offered.
It would be cool to tweet what game your playing or post on fb every time you win gold and collect an achievement.
Keeping busy this past week. I did this 53 inch Spider Man afghan, its crochet. This is the 7th one I have made since I started making them in November 2007. I have several to make before the end of the year.
Arrogance is an absorbing sense of one’s own greatness. It is a feeling of one’s superiority over others. In the presence of superiors, overweening pride manifests itself as arrogance. Pride is too self-satisfied to care for seeing the good in others and in praising them.
And swapped between, depending who was listening,
I guess I have to take that comment for what it is; a sincere compliment to my abilities. Besides, as I have said before, I have already succeeded. This is just icing on the cake.
Jesus alone is without sin, He alone is good
I just keep trying to think positive, that everything will be okay. I'm giving him his space and I'm not contacting him...I need to create a change. I am just thankful I have work tomorrow and school the rest of the week... I feel so anxious.
- 2 Tbsp sugar
I'm sitting out here on this front porch again, listening to the trucks over on the highway. It's almost too cool out here, which is not what I expected when I picked up the laptop and came out here -- it's been a hot, muggy day.
I hope you like the Voodoo Sisters as it was great fun to make. Andrea would love it if you would join in the challenge this week as she has a totally unique prize...................what is it I hear you cry........well you will just have to pop over to Smudger's and have a look won't you...............lol
-”We’re going home.”
Here is Elijah. This box was what some of the "kitchen loaner" items came in. Elijah was using it to try and reach his clothes. He fell. He started crying, telling us he was stuck. So he was completely naked trying to reach his clothes. Quite a sight.
How many in South Africa and in the United States once attempted to pass for white in order they gain access to privileges denied them for no other reason than race?
I would love to hear your thoughts about this week's podcast, so please drop me a line. Also, I would be happy to provide a tracklist for this show to anyone who is interested.
Now it's time to prepare for Christmas...I'm so not ready!
I hadn’t read many contemporary children’s novels at all, with the exception of Philip Pullman’s His Dark Materials trilogy, passed on to me by adult fans of his. I do read children’s novels now, and am a fan of Sally Gardner, FE Higgins, Julia Green and Marcus Sedgwick, to name a few. I tend not to read children’s books when I am writing, though, to keep my head clear.
As anyone still reading this blog is probably aware, I'm doing NaNo again this year. Only I've gotten so used to it, I decided to make things a bit more "interesting". The curious can read the details over on the blog I set up just for this wild project: Thirty Days and Nights of Inksanity. Yes, I'm writing in longhand, with fountain pens and inks, and posting about them each day. I'm a few days behind, thanks to the "snowpocalypse" that struck in late October (which I posted about over there, too). But I'm having fun...
1. I will give up cooking and baking altogether if I move back to India. I care too much about convenience and much less about my passion (if I can call it that) for baking. UK has spoilt me with ready made ingredients, like simple powdered sugar for instance. I hate having to grind sugar (large as rocks btw) and make a mess with the powder. The weather makes it impossible to store maida, baking powder, etc etc at room temp, which means the refrigerator is packed with things and I hate a stuffed refrigerator. I cooked thrice in 3 weeks and hated every moment of it. The 2 cakes I made was a disaster and the butter chicken, my family complained, was too bland like the Brits have it (this, after gloating on my previous post about how I figured out the perfect, traditional chicken tikka masala).
Miller E, Fairley CK, Cohen BJ, Seng C. Immediate and long term outcome of human parvovirus B19 infection in pregnancy. Br J Obstet Gynaecol 1998; 105: 174-178.
Folks have finally caught sight of the slaughter house and realized they’ve been following a Judas goat.
Well, it’s not over yet. At least not until the police say so. On Wednesday, the Bukit Aman CID director announced that the police would arrest participants who turned violent during Bersih 3.0, based on photos and recordings shot by several quarters.
Yusuf Lule - Interim president of Uganda 1979,
This is Phil Dick on a bad hair day. This is George Orwell suffering from migraine. This is Stanislaw Lem with a boil on his anal rim. The holiday cruise of the future involves safaris conducted from offshore destroyers, targeting carloads of suspected Muslim terrorists.
The girls and I kept very quiet today. We tidied up a little bit, read books, watched the Trinkabelle DVD. I had an appointment with my specialist for my post-surgery check-up. Next time I have a doctor's appointment, I'm going to convince the kids I'm feeling poorly, because those little girls sat placidly in the double pram, nibbling rice crackers and reading Dora books. No one needed to go to the toilet, no one disgraced themselves in their nappy, no one continuously interrupted Dr. Johnson asking for drinks or more snacks or to go to the circus. It was the easiest doctor's visit I've ever had, and I even had to get up on the examining table!! Seriously. If telling the kids how sick I am guarantees good behaviour.....well. You know what I'll be doing next time!
From a bit further away it almost looks like a flowered wreath the way the colors kind of meld together, but closer you can see that it's not.
One of the classic Baba Yaga fairy tales became Anastasia’s story: the tale of Vasilisa the Brave. In the original tale, Vasilisa’s stepmother sends her to Baba Yaga’s forest to get light from the witch. It’s a little bit Cinderella, a little bit Hansel and Gretel. Of course, this is supposed to be a death sentence and Baba Yaga’s supposed to eat Vasilisa. But the girl’s real mother had given her a magic doll before she died. And the doll helps Vasilisa outwit the witch. In Dreaming Anastasia, Anastasia has the doll her mother gave her. And like the original story, the doll talks to Anastasia and helps her survive. Like in Dark Goddess, the doll becomes quite significant. Because I decided to use a matryoshka doll – as did you! (great minds and all that-Sarwat) – the nesting aspect becomes a metaphor for much of what occurs. As Baba Yaga says to Anne, “Stories within stories. Secrets within secrets.” So that bit of folklore combines with Baba Yaga herself.
Weight & Size
They aren’t aware of the comedy trio behind the bar.
He reminded me in our time together that I, too, am His child and He has every intention of loving me, caring for me, and giving me the future that He has planned for me.
I once had a roommate who was pretty, smart, and successful. However, her self-esteem was almost non-existent. She would date a guy, he would treat her like shit, she would believe she actually WAS shit and deserved to be treated as such, and eventually she'd get her heart broken and go into a major depression. The next guy she would date would be exactly like the previous asshole who'd mistreated her and, although the lessons were abundant, she refused to learn from them. After going through this cycle with her several times, I was really, really exhausted by the drama and monotony of it all, and decided I could no longer live with her. Our friendship didn't end, but it definitely suffered. If she wasn't willing to make some changes and break the damaging cycles in her life (even though that's what she repeatedly claimed she wanted to do), I couldn't stick around and watch. It was just too sad.
The ministerial code states that scheduled flights should be used unless deemed impractical.
There are a couple things I want to do differently for next year. First - I want to figure out how to add my fancy script signature to the bottom of my posts. Second - I want to add a small paragraph to the beginning of each post with a quick explanation of what the challenge is and to show that I'm not a posting weirdo. Thirdly - I'm not going to ignore regular posting.
Fashion is dictated by designers of the major fashion labels but it is the market that decides what they like and what will be the next big thing. This in turn determines the success of the season collection. Marketing is dictated by upper management, business structure and organizational goals and most importantly the brand at hand. However the success of the marketing efforts is determined by the market as well, which is heavily dependent of the interpretation of the tactics. This determines the success of the brand, the brand value and a customers’ lifetime value with that brand.
That was a lot of work.
“The other day we were doing this big reveal shot of all the Avengers. Thor has got his hammer, Cap’s got his shield, Hawkeye has his bow and arrow, and Hulk is huge. Then it pans over to me and I’ve got guns. Iron Man’s like, hovering above all of us, ready to go. I was like, ‘Joss… um… do I look okay holding these guns?’ And he said ‘She’s a total badass. She’s a killing machine.’”
Professor Michael Hagemeister, Ludwig-Maximilians-University Munich
Wow this family tree is just filled with more tragedy than a emo's social life
( Himal SouthAsian , Aug 2009)
Every driver knows that the joy of your birthday is annually derailed by the required trip to the Secretary of State. I know, thanks to the internet, it is now a much simpler process...unless you are covered in clutter as I am. Last October when I received my renewal notice, I wrote out a check for the amount desired, sealed the envelope, and just needed to wait until I had the money in the bank.
“This is like a cross between a soufflé and a light pudding. A soufflé is an
The rebel yell mating call of the inebriated, red-gilled, leather-backed, hound dog: “Freeeeee Birrrrrrrrrrrd!”
A: I've tried a number of ways. I have used a graphic tablet, and various high-tech bits and bobs but I find it’s quicker and more
Me: What! You have a great imagination, you use it all the time!
Ryan (the chef) and Jen (his loving, supportive and equally talented partner) are the amazing husband and wife duo who started hosting bimonthly dinners at their home. The dinner parties are actually a preview of their soon to open restaurant, Staplehouse. The dinners are aptly named Prelude to Staplehouse, where Ryan can sample dishes to add to his menu while getting immediate feedback from diners.
The taste was surprisingly sweet and not unlike sweet potato. It made a lovely new addition to the dinner table but perhaps did not bring with it the diversity I’d been hoping for. After all, I’d been hoping to expand my horizons away from sweet potatoes. Then again, why change something that works.
“The alcohol was flowing and I started to kiss her and soon enough my husband joined in and then…and then, he did the strangest thing. He went down on her.”
"Hmm. It's the hair" she replied, "I think..."
Dear Heavenly Father, I thank You for Your Word and its ability to produce for me what it talks about. Today, I speak forth Your Word with faith in my spirit. As I speak and believe that those things I say will come to pass, I will have whatsoever I say, in Jesus Christ Mighty Name I pray! Amen!
Concelebrating with His Beatitude were Metropolitan Pavel of Vyshgorod and Chernobyl, abbot of the Laura; Archbishop Antoniy of Borispol, head of the Department for External Church Relations of the Ukrainian Orthodox Church and Rector of the Kievan Theological Schools; Archbishop Alexander of Pereyaslav-Khmelnitsky and Vishnevoye, secretary of the Primate of the Ukrainian Orthodox Church; Bishops Nikodim of Zhitomir and Novograd-Volynskiy, Ilariy of Makarov, Panteleimon of Vasilkov, and ordained monks of the Laura.
why is it happening? To be truly genocide there needs to be intent. Is there really a mass conspiracy by evil people determined to destroy the white race? The acts are deliberate, but is their inevitable outcome their purpose? Or are there other factors, other agendas and other motives which have brought us to where we are?
Whisk flour, sugar, salt.
So, I liked it. Loads. Paul Anderson put some fun into the fourth RE movie. He plays well with stereotypes and serves to the fans of the series – probably because they are the only ones who are still watching. I really love Alice and the chemistry between her and Claire – and I guess it is not too far-fetched to indicate that there is some serious girlfriend-trope going on between the two. Of course, the first is still the best – nothing beats Michelle Rodriguez bad-assedness – but this one is a good homage to the whole series. The beginning is a little bumpy, though.
3) my energy improves
Still, an edgy Perry even tweaked the song’s lyrics to make the song even more pointed at Brand. One line originally read “You can keep the dog from me, I never liked him anyway.” For Sunday’s show, Perry sang “Keep your diamond ring/In fact, you can keep everything…Except for me.”
Today I decided to start with some sort of pocket for the bedroom TV remote and my nook. You can see I have a dresser right beside my bed. I wanted something that would cover the top of the dresser and have pockets in the side. My goal is to NOT buy anything, to use fabrics I already have. So this fabric was in my stash, I have a lot of it, not sure why...must have been on sale at some point. I didn't want to use any of my nice quilt batting, so I decided to use a piece of an old blanket I was going to throw out.
Into this melee of madness walks Albert Hockenberry (Adam Baldwin) a kid from the farmlands looking to make it in the world of cab-driving. His dad being an old friend of Harold's he is welcomed into the fold and taught the ropes, as well as the madness of a bunch of lunatics with cabbie licenses. After misadventures aplenty and romance in the offing with petite waitress Claudette (Jill Schoelen), Albert finds himself rallying these misfits into making a better life for themselves. But when he is kidnapped (long story), the cabbies have to pull themselves together to save Albert and themselves.
Acceptance makes people feel understood. The reason we don’t extend acceptance is because we’re afraid it means approval. We’re stingy with approval.
Styles: Pop, Rock, Soft Rock
I offered to do the food for one particular party a friend was hosting. Mulling over the logistics of containing and moving food for 25 I decided to make a giant chilli con carne, (the premise being- rice/mince/ lutenitza style sauce- are all more than popular.) Thinking ahead, I even made two, one hot and one not. Smugly I expected a runaway success on my hands. As I set it on the table in a ‘taddah!’ moment of glory, the more traditional Bulgarians at the party recoiled in unconcealed horror and proceed to help themselves to more salad in disgust. I think they may still be whispering about the disastrous incident in the village cafe, even today.
Fred Burton is a known quantity in the highest Intelligence circles. He has been Deputy Chief of the Department of State’s counterterrorism division for the Diplomatic Security Service (DSS).
Joe will find out when his foot surgery will be scheduled on Wednesday, 4/4.
The holiday concert is two weeks away (November 26th). When I haven't been behind the harp playing, I've been...
“What are you doing, Joe?” I asked.
- small mercies, like morning school walks with my girl!
So, with A more than ever off doing her own thing, its made me think about all the new freedom I now have. What could I get up to? Climb more mountains...write a novel...get a boyfriend...learn to surf...
There are only two problems with that honest assessment.
The way I figure, if he puts a ring on my finger, there’ll be an announcement. I promise. I may even get gaudy and post my engagement ring on Facebook. I’ve never been engaged. I can’t say that I won’t completely flip out over someone actually choosing me for life. That’s pretty much my dream.
After the oil heats in a pan, add the cumin and mustard seeds, the whole garam masalas slightly crushed, then add the onions, fry till light brown. Once onions have nicely browned, add the ginger and garlic paste, fry for 3 to 4 mins, then add the masalas. After the masalas are fried and oil starts to separate, add the paneer, green chillies and the tomatoes. Mix everything and cook for a couple of minutes before adding the milk. Cook till the milk evaporates or a slight gravy is left. Add the salt according to taste.
“Is the kid still trying to get out of here?”
He just smiled, but his eyes studied her. Watchful. Probing. Aware.
On one wall in their bedroom is a row of four very sturdy hooks. Each child has a hook to hang their backpacks and lesson bags on (like their dance bag or piano bag). This helps keep all the clutter off the floor. Under the hooks is a red bench (not pictured) with a large basket tray perched on top for collecting all their school papers; things like field trip permission slips and log-in information for homework.
Leif and I are in constant amazement of Riley. She picks things up fast and puts so many sentences together but we have no idea that she knew half of the words she says. I love watching her personality develop as she gets older. Its weird because its like she was always like this. From the beginning. Its just much more obvious now. So amazing!
Logan traveled up to New Hampshire for Not Back to School Camp in September and drove for the first time instead of flying. He was accompanied by his girlfriend, Josie, and they camped and also stayed with friends along their route. Then a couple of weeks ago, he attended the ZTC Camp which was held in downtown Asheville. Brenna, as well as several friends, also particpated in the weekend event and we happily hosted a couple of the attendees who needed a place to stay before it began. From my perspective, ZTC Camp was a huge success and both my kids as well as some of the other young adults attending gave it glowing reviews.
"My role is to work with the growers to get the information they need to produce a quality product and make money at it," he said. "I don’t work with growers just in Madison County, I work with all of New York State.
After the sole survivor passed away their kids had a child of their own and now the friends are tied to the new child as “Unlikely Angels.”
Johnson, H. 1992. Women’s Empowerment and Public Action: Experiences from Latin America. In: Wuyts, M. et al. eds. Development policy and public action. Oxford, Open University.
A heartfelt thank you to Megan and Jesse for sharing your big day with us and best wishes for a fabulous future together! And a special thanks to photographer Melanie Mauer for sending over these beautiful photos! Cheers!
Have a great day!!!!
"Willful infringement danger," where developers would be reluctant to look at any patent data whatsoever for fear of becoming liable for willful infringement.
3rd Line Butterfly
Thank the person who gave you this award.
inimical thereto. And I do further swear (or affirm) that, to the best
Oct 14 - Beat Kitchen - Chicago, IL
Icy Berries
Could it be the quest for money and fame,
Mountain villages clinging on the flanks, looking forward to exploring that!
Hello, hope you'll had a good weekend. Now then the 5th F1 race today gave us a 5th different team winning race this season and chances are the next one in Monaco is won by a team that has been close, Lotus, an unseen start of the season after the total dominance of Red Bull/Vettel last year. Hamilton behaved and managed his tyres and got to eight and told the press afterwards he was proud of his achievement and so are his fans who feel that everytime he breaks the rules he's unfairly punished because of the colour of his skin. Good thing it isn't green. In England worlds most expensive championship was decided in extra time after 38 games whilst United was waiting on the pitch to celebrate, City scored the winner in the dying seconds of extra time, once again truth shows to be stranger than fiction. They are still no team though, just a collection of great players. Leaves just one big decider this season the Champions Trofee, will Bayern be caught out by that other billionaires team Chelsea, consideing how we all have been screwed by the moneymen these last years I hope the German collective wins.
When you feel like all the tape strips are in the right position, press them down firmly so that they stay put on the surface. Then apply your layering color with a thin but opaque coat...
Presentation for Tyndale
“Well, I grew up with it and I’m fine.”
